——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Кроме этой фигуры, таким образом принимавшей участие в семейном счастии хозяина, у которого было пятеро сытеньких мальчиков, понравился мне еще один господин. Но этот уже был совершенно другого свойства. Это было Лицо. Звали его Юлиан Мастакович. С первого взгляда можно было видеть, что он был гостем почетным и находился в таких же отношениях к хозяину, в каких хозяин к господину, гладившему свои бакенбарды. Хозяин и хозяйка говорили ему бездну любезностей, ухаживали, поили его, лелеяли, подводили к нему, для рекомендации, своих гостей, а его самого ни к кому не подводили. Я заметил, что у хозяина заискрилась слеза на глазах, когда Юлиан Мастакович отнесся по вечеру, что он редко проводит таким приятным образом время. Мне как-то стало страшно в присутствии такого лица, и потому, полюбовавшись на детей, я ушел в маленькую гостиную, которая была совершенно пуста, и засел в цветочную беседку хозяйки, занимавшую почти половину всей комнаты.
Дети все были до невероятности милы и решительно не хотели походить на больших, несмотря на все увещания гувернанток и маменек. Они разобрали всю елку вмиг, до последней конфетки, и успели уже переломать половину игрушек, прежде чем узнали, кому какая назначена. Особенно хорош был один мальчик, черноглазый, в кудряшках, который всё хотел меня застрелить из своего деревянного ружья. Но всех более обратила на себя внимание его сестра, девочка лет одиннадцати, прелестная, как амурчик, тихонькая, задумчивая, бледная, с большими задумчивыми глазами навыкате. Ее как-то обидели дети, и потому она ушла в ту самую гостиную, где сидел я, и занялась в уголку -- своей куклой. Гости с уважением указывали на одного богатого откупщика, ее родителя, и кое-кто замечал шепотом, что за ней уже отложено на приданое триста тысяч рублей. Я оборотился взглянуть на любопытствующих о таком обстоятельстве, и взгляд мой упал на Юлиана Мастаковича, который, закинув руки за спину и наклонив немножечко голову набок, как-то чрезвычайно внимательно прислушивался к празднословию этих господ. Потом я не мог не подивиться мудрости хозяев при раздаче детских подарков. Девочка, уже имевшая триста тысяч рублей приданого, получила богатейшую куклу. Потом следовали подарки понижаясь, смотря по понижению рангов родителей всех этих счастливых детей. Наконец, последний ребенок, мальчик лет десяти, худенький, маленький, весноватенький, рыженький, получил только одну книжку повестей, толковавших о величии природы, о слезах умиления и прочее, без картинок и даже без виньетки. Он был сын гувернантки хозяйских детей, одной бедной вдовы, мальчик крайне забитый и запуганный. Одет он был в курточку из убогой нанки. Получив свою книжку, он долгое время ходил ока других игрушек; ему ужасно хотелось поиграть с другим детьми, но он не смел; видно было, что он уже чувствовал и понимал свое положение. Я очень люблю наблюдать за детьми. Чрезвычайно любопытно в них первое, самостоятельное проявление в жизни. Я заметил, что рыженький мальчик до того соблазнился богатыми игрушкам других детей, особенно театром, в котором ему непременно хотелось взять на себя какую-то роль, что решился поподличать. Он улыбался и заигрывал с другими детьми, он отдал свое яблоко одному одутловатому мальчишке, у которого навязан был полный платок гостинцев, и даже решился повозить одного на себе, чтоб только не отогнали его от театра. Но чрез минуту какой-то озорник препорядочно поколотил его. Ребенок не посмел заплакать Тут явилась гувернантка, его маменька, и велела ему не мешать играть другим детям. Ребенок вошел в ту же гостиную, где была девочка. Она пустила его к себе и оба весьма усердно принялись наряжать богатую куклу.
Я сидел уже с полчаса в плющевой беседке и почти задремал, прислушиваясь к маленькому говору рыженького мальчика и красавицы с тремястами тысяч приданого хлопотавших о кукле, как вдруг в комнату вошел Юлиан Мастакович. Он воспользовался скандалезною сценою ссоры детей и вышел потихоньку из залы. Я заметил, что он с минуту назад весьма горячо говорил с папенькой будущей богатой невесты, с которым только что познакомился, о преимуществе какой-то службы перед другою.
Теперь он стоял в раздумье и как будто что-то рассчитывал по пальцам.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

-- А что вы тут делаете, милое дитя? -- спросил он шепотом, оглядываясь и трепля девочку по щеке.
-- Играем...
-- А? с ним? -- Юлиан Мастакович покосился на мальчика.
-- А ты бы, душенька, пошел в залу, -- сказал он ему. Мальчик молчал и глядел на него во все глаза. Юлиан Мастакович опять поосмотрелся кругом и опять нагнулся к девочке.
-- А что это у вас, куколка, милое дитя? -- спросил он.
-- Куколка, -- отвечала девочка, морщась и немножко робея.
-- Куколка... А знаете ли вы, милое дитя, из чего ваша куколка сделана?
-- Не знаю... -- отвечала девочка шепотом и совершенно потупив голову.
-- А из тряпочек, душенька. Ты бы пошел, мальчик, в залу, к своим сверстникам, -- сказал Юлиан Мастакович, строго посмотрев на ребенка. Девочка и мальчик поморщились и схватились друг за друга. Им не хотелось разлучаться.
-- А знаете ли вы, почему подарили вам эту куколку? -- спросил Юлиан Мастакович, понижая всё более и более голос.
-- Не знаю.
-- А оттого, что вы были милое и благонравное дитя всю неделю.
Тут Юлиан Мастакович, взволнованный донельзя, осмотрелся кругом и, понижая всё более и более голос, спросил наконец неслышным, почти совсем замирающим от волнения и нетерпения голосом:
-- А будете ли вы любить меня, милая девочка, когда я приеду в гости к вашим родителям?
Сказав это, Юлиан Мастакович хотел еще один раз поцеловать милую девочку, но рыженький мальчик, видя, что она совсем хочет заплакать, схватил ее за руки и захныкал от полнейшего сочувствия к ней. Юлиан Мастакович рассердился не в шутку.
-- Пошел, пошел отсюда, пошел! -- говорил он мальчишке. -- Пошел в залу! пошел туда, к своим сверстникам!
-- Нет, не нужно, не нужно! подите вы прочь, -- сказала девочка, -- оставьте его, оставьте его! -- говорила она, почти совсем заплакав.
Кто-то зашумел в дверях, Юлиан Мастакович тотчас же приподнял свой величественный корпус и испугался. Но рыженький мальчик испугался еще более Юлиана Мастаковича, бросил девочку и тихонько, опираясь о стенку, прошел из гостиной в столовую. Чтоб не подать подозрений, Юлиан Мастакович пошел также в столовую. Он был красен как рак и, взглянув в зеркало, как будто сконфузился себя самого. Ему, может быть, стало досадно за горячку свою и свое нетерпение. Может быть, его так поразил вначале расчет по пальцам, так соблазнил и вдохновил, что он, несмотря на всю солидность и важность, решился поступить как мальчишка и прямо абордировать свой предмет, несмотря на то что предмет мог быть настоящим предметом по крайней мере пять лет спустя. Я вышел за почтенным господином в столовую и увидел странное зрелище. Юлиан Мастакович, весь покраснев от досады и злости, пугал рыжего мальчика, который, уходя от него всё дальше и дальше, не знал -- куда забежать от страха.
-- Пошел, что здесь делаешь, пошел, негодник, пошел!
Ты здесь фрукты таскаешь, а? Ты здесь фрукты таскаешь? Пошел, негодник, пошел, сопливый, пошел, пошел к своим сверстникам!
Перепуганный мальчик, решившись на отчаянное средство, попробовал было залезть под стол. Тогда его гонитель, разгоряченный донельзя, вынул свой длинный батистовый платок и начал им выхлестывать из-под стола ребенка, присмиревшего до последней степени. Нужно заметить, что Юлиан Мастакович был немножко толстенек. Это был человек сытенький, румяненький, плотненький, с брюшком, с жирными ляжками, словом, что называется, крепняк, кругленький, как орешек. Он вспотел, пыхтел и краснел ужасно. Наконец он почти остервенился, так велико было в нем чувство негодования и, может быть (кто знает?), ревности. Я захохотал во всё горло. Юлиан Мастакович оборотился и, несмотря на всё значение свое, сконфузился в прах. В это время из противоположной двери вошел хозяин. Мальчишка вылез из-под стола и обтирал свои колени и локти. Юлиан Мастакович поспешил поднесть к носу платок, который держал, за один кончик, в руках.
Хозяин немножко с недоумением посмотрел на троих нас; но, как человек, знающий жизнь и смотрящий на нее с точки серьезной, тотчас же воспользовался тем, что поймал наедине своего гостя.
-- Вот-с тот мальчик-с, -- сказал он, указав на рыженького, -- о котором я имел честь просить...
-- А? -- отвечал Юлиан Мастакович, еще не совсем оправившись.
-- Сын гувернантки детей моих, -- продолжал хозяин просительным тоном, -- бедная женщина, вдова, жена одного честного чиновника; и потому... Юлиан Мастакович, если возможно...
-- Ах, нет, нет, -- поспешно закричал Юлиан Мастакович, -- нет, извините меня, Филипп Алексеевич, никак невозможно-с. Я справлялся: вакансии нет, а если бы и была, то на нее уже десять кандидатов, гораздо более имеющих право, чем он... Очень жаль, очень жаль...
-- Жаль-с, -- повторил хозяин, -- мальчик скромненький, тихонький...
-- Шалун большой, как я замечаю, -- отвечал Юлиан Мастакович, истерически скривив рот, -- пошел, мальчик, что ты стоишь, пойди к своим сверстникам! -- сказал он, обращаясь к ребенку.
Тут он, кажется, не мог утерпеть и взглянул на меня одним глазом. Я тоже не мог утерпеть и захохотал ему прямо в глаза. Юлиан Мастакович тотчас же отворотился и довольно явственно для меня спросил у хозяина, кто этот странный молодой человек? Они зашептались и вышли из комнаты. Я видел потом, как Юлиан Мастакович, слушая хозяина, с недоверчивостию качал головою.
Нахохотавшись вдоволь, я воротился в залу. Там великий муж, окруженный отцами и матерями семейств, хозяйкой и хозяином, что-то с жаром толковал одной даме, к которой его только что подвели. Дама держала за руку девочку, с которою, десять минут назад, Юлиан Мастакович имел сцену в гостиной. Теперь он рассыпался в похвалах и восторгах о красоте, талантах, грации и благовоспитанности милого дитяти. Он заметно юлил перед маменькой. Мать слушала его чуть ли не со слезами восторга. Губы отца улыбались. Хозяин радовался излияниям всеобщей радости. Даже все гости сочувствовали, даже игры детей были остановлены, чтоб не мешать разговору. Весь воздух был напоен благоговением. Я слышал потом, как тронутая до глубины сердца маменька интересной девочки в отборных выражениях просила Юлиана Мастаковича сделать ей особую честь, подарить их дом своим драгоценным знакомством; слышал, с каким неподдельным восторгом Юлиан Мастакович принял приглашение и как потом гости, разойдясь все, как приличие требовало, в разные стороны, рассыпались друг перед другом в умилительных похвалах откупщику, откупщице, девочке и в особенности Юлиану Мастаковичу.
-- Женат этот господин? -- спросил я, почти вслух, одного из знакомых моих, стоявшего ближе всех к Юлиану Мастаковичу.
Юлиан Мастакович бросил на меня испытующий и злобный взгляд.
-- Нет! -- отвечал мне мой знакомый, огорченный до глубины сердца моею неловкостию, которую я сделал умышленно...
Недавно я проходил мимо ской церкви; толпа и съезд поразили меня. Кругом говорили о свадьбе. День был пасмурный, начиналась изморось; я пробрался за толпою в церковь и увидал жениха. Это был маленький, кругленький, сытенький человечек с брюшком, весьма разукрашенный. Он бегал, хлопотал и распоряжался. Наконец раздался говор, что привезли невесту. Я протеснился сквозь толпу и увидел чудную красавицу, для которой едва настала первая весна. Но красавица была бледна и грустна. Она смотрела рассеянно; мне показалось даже, что глаза ее были красны от недавних слез. Античная строгость каждой черты лица ее придавала какую-то важность и торжественность ее красоте. Но сквозь эту строгость и важность, сквозь эту грусть просвечивал еще первый детский, невинный облик; сказывалось что-то донельзя наивное, неустановившееся, юное и, казалось, без просьб само за себя молившее о пощаде.
Говорили, что ей едва минуло шестнадцать лет. Взглянув внимательно на жениха, я вдруг узнал в нем Юлиана Мастаковича, которого не видел ровно пять лет. Я поглядел на нее... Боже мой! Я стал протесняться скорее из церкви. В толпе толковали, что невеста богата, что у невесты пятьсот тысяч приданого... и на сколько-то тряпками...
"Однако расчет был хорош!" -- подумал я, протеснившись на улицу...


——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

По большой базарной площади, в виду домов с наглухо закрытыми ставнями, шли два обывателя: казначей Почешихин и ходатай по делам (он же и старинный корреспондент «Сына отечества») Оптимов. Оба шли и по случаю жары молчали. Оптимову хотелось осудить управу за пыль и нечистоту базарной площади, но, зная миролюбивый нрав и умеренное направление спутника, он молчал.
На середине площади Почешихин вдруг остановился и стал глядеть на небо.
— Что вы смотрите, Евпл Серапионыч?
— Скворцы полетели. Гляжу, куда сядут. Туча тучей! Ежели, положим, из ружья выпалить, да ежели потом собрать... да ежели... В саду отца протоиерея сели!
— Нисколько, Евпл Серапионыч. Не у отца протоиерея, а у отца дьякона Вратоадова. Если с этого места выпалить, то ничего не убьешь. Дробь мелкая и, покуда долетит, ослабнет. Да и за что их, посудите, убивать? Птица насчет ягод вредная, это верно, но все-таки тварь, всякое дыхание. Скворец, скажем, поет... А для чего он, спрашивается, поет? Для хвалы поет. Всякое дыхание да хвалит господа. Ой, нет! Кажется, у отца протоиерея сели!
Мимо беседующих бесшумно прошли три старые богомолки с котомками и в лапотках. Поглядев вопросительно на Почешихина и Оптимова, которые всматривались почему-то в дом отца протоиерея, они пошли тише и, отойдя немного, остановились и еще раз взглянули на друзей и потом сами стали смотреть на дом отца протоиерея.
— Да, вы правду сказали, они у отца протоиерея сели, — продолжал Оптимов. — У него теперь вишня поспела, так вот они и полетели клевать.
Из Протопоповой калитки вышел сам отец протоиерей Восьмистишиев и с ним дьячок Евстигней. Увидев обращенное в его сторону внимание и не понимая, на что это смотрят люди, он остановился и, вместе с дьячком, стал тоже глядеть вверх, чтобы понять.
— Отец Паисий, надо полагать, на требу идет, — сказал Почешихин. — Помогай ему бог!
В пространстве между друзьями и отцом протоиереем прошли только что выкупавшиеся в реке фабричные купца Пурова. Увидев отца Паисия, напрягавшего свое внимание на высь поднебесную, и богомолок, которые стояли неподвижно и тоже смотрели вверх, они остановились и стали глядеть туда же. То же самое сделал и мальчик, ведший нищего-слепца, и мужик, несший для свалки на площади бочонок испортившихся сельдей.
— Что-то случилось, надо думать, — сказал Почешихин. — Пожар, что ли? Да нет, не видать дыму! Эй, Кузьма! — крикнул он остановившемуся мужику. — Что там случилось?
Мужик что-то ответил, но Почешихин и Оптимов ничего не расслышали. У всех лавочных дверей показались сонные приказчики. Штукатуры, мазавшие лабаз купца Фертикулина, оставили свои лестницы и присоединились к фабричным. Пожарный, описывавший босыми ногами круги на каланче, остановился и, поглядев немного, спустился вниз. Каланча осиротела. Это показалось подозрительным.
— Уж не пожар ли где-нибудь? Да вы не толкайтесь! Чёрт свинячий!
— Где вы видите пожар? Какой пожар? Господа, разойдитесь! Вас честью просят!
— Должно, внутри загорелось!
— Честью просит, а сам руками тычет. Не махайте руками! Вы хоть и господин начальник, а вы не имеете никакого полного права рукам волю давать!
— На мозоль наступил! А, чтоб тебя раздавило!
— Кого раздавило? Ребята, человека задавили!
— Почему такая толпа? За какой надобностью?
— Человека, ваше выскблаародие, задавило!
— Где? Рразойдитесь! Господа, честью прошу! Честью просят тебя, дубина!
— Мужиков толкай, а благородных не смей трогать! Не прикасайся!
— Нешто это люди? Нешто их, чертей, проймешь добрым словом? Сидоров, сбегай-ка за Акимом Данилычем! Живо! Господа, ведь вам же плохо будет! Придет Аким Данилыч, и вам же достанется! И ты тут, Парфен?! А еще тоже слепец, святой старец! Ничего не видит, а туда же, куда и люди, не повинуется! Смирнов, запиши Парфена!
— Слушаю! И пуровских прикажете записать? Вот этот самый, который щека распухши, — это пуровский!
— Пуровских не записывай покуда... Пуров завтра именинник!
Скворцы темной тучей поднялись над садом отца протоиерея, но Почешихин и Оптимов уже не видели их; они стояли и всё глядели вверх, стараясь понять, зачем собралась такая толпа и куда она смотрит. Показался Аким Данилыч. Что-то жуя и вытирая губы, он взревел и врезался в толпу.
— Пожжаррные, приготовьсь! Рразойдитесь! Господин Оптимов, разойдитесь, ведь вам же плохо будет! Чем в газеты на порядочных людей писать разные критики, вы бы лучше сами старались вести себя посущественней! Добру-то не научат газеты!
— Прошу вас не касаться гласности! — вспылил Оптимов. — Я литератор и не дозволю вам касаться гласности, хотя, по долгу гражданина, и почитаю вас, как отца и благодетеля!
— Пожарные, лей!
— Воды нет, ваше высокоблаародие!
— Не рразговаривать! Поезжайте за водой! Живааа!
— Не на чем ехать, ваше высокоблагородие. Майор на пожарных лошадях поехали ихнюю тетеньку провожать!
— Разойдитесь! Сдай назад, чтоб тебя черти взяли... Съел? Запиши-ка его, чёрта!
— Карандаш потерялся, ваше высокоблаародие...
Толпа всё увеличивалась и увеличивалась... Бог знает, до каких бы размеров она выросла, если бы в трактире Грешкина не вздумали пробовать полученный на днях из Москвы новый орган. Заслышав «Стрелочка», толпа ахнула и повалила к трактиру. Так никто и не узнал, почему собралась толпа, а Оптимов и Почешихин уже забыли о скворцах, истинных виновниках происшествия. Через час город был уже недвижим и тих, и виден был только один-единственный человек — это пожарный, ходивший на каланче...
Вечером того же дня Аким Данилыч сидел в бакалейной лавке Фертикулина, пил лимонад-газес с коньяком и писал: «Кроме официальной бумаги, смею добавить, ваше — ство, и от себя некоторое присовокупление. Отец и благодетель! Именно только молитвами вашей добродетельной супруги, живущей в благорастворенной даче близ нашего города, дело не дошло до крайних пределов! Столько я вынес за сей день, что и описать не могу. Распорядительность Крушенского и пожарного майора Портупеева не находит себе подходящего названия. Горжусь сими достойными слугами отечества! Я же сделал всё, что может сделать слабый человек, кроме добра ближнему ничего не желающий, и, сидя теперь среди домашнего очага своего, благодарю со слезами Того, кто не допустил до кровопролития. Виновные, за недостатком улик, сидят пока взаперти, но думаю их выпустить через недельку. От невежества преступили заповедь!»

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

He journeyed to see a wealthier and more powerful ally, finding himself captivated by the Holy Trinity church recently erected by Sigtryg and Bishop Donatus within the core of old Celtic Dublin rather than the Danish quarter—a clear sign that Norse dominance had crumbled. This inspired him to commission a similar sanctuary in Waterford. He appeared as a robust, successful monarch, reclining in his timber hall near Reginald’s Tower, sipping imported wines from golden goblets and ivory horns. Above him rested a massive double-bitted axe, which sycophants claimed he had used to slay Brian Boru rather than falling to him, a convenient myth preferred by local chroniclers over reality. Meanwhile, distant monks and musicians lamented the demise of the blonde-haired Ranald and his armored legions. A bard named Teague MacMurrough had written a song about Clontarf that reached Ranald, who was so entertained he had the poet captured and hauled to Waterford. There, under the threat of steel, the harper was forced to perform the Milesian account of the battle for the king and his warriors. When the terrified musician reached the part describing Ranald's own slaughter by Boru, the Viking roared with laughter until he wept. Far from executing the man, he rewarded him with wine, appointed him his court minstrel, and invited his family to join him, insisting he perform the song of Clontarf daily. He treated the bard much as the English crown had once patronized another Irish musician whose historical fantasies were even more absurd than Teague's. It was to this king, or specifically his son Sigtryg—a godson of Sigtryg Silkbeard and a relative—that Hereward now traveled.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Henry II. and Strongbow. They intermarried in the mean while with the native Irish. Brian Boru, for instance, was so connected with Danish royalty, that it is still a question whether he himself had not Danish blood in his veins. King Sigtryg Silkbeard, who fought against him at Clontarf, was actually his step-son,--and so too, according to another Irish chronicler, was King Olaff Kvaran, who even at the time of the battle of Clontarf was married to Brian Boru's daughter,--a marriage which (if a fact) was startlingly within the prohibited degrees of consanguinity. But the ancient Irish were sadly careless on such points; and as Giraldus Cambrensis says, "followed the example of men of old in their vices more willingly than in their virtues." More than forty years had elapsed since that famous battle of Clontarf, and since Ragnvald, Reginald, or Ranald, son of Sigtryg the Norseman, had been slain therein by Brian Boru. On that one day, so the Irish sang, the Northern invaders were exterminated, once and for all, by the Milesian hero, who had craftily used the strangers to fight his battles, and then, the moment they became formidable to himself, crushed them, till "from Howth to Brandon in Kerry there was not a threshing-floor without a Danish slave threshing thereon, or a quern without a Danish woman grinding thereat." Nevertheless, in spite of the total annihilation of the Danish power in the Emerald isle, Ranald seemed to the eyes of men to be still a hale old warrior, ruling constitutionally--that is, with a wholesome fear of being outlawed or murdered if he misbehaved--over the Danes in Waterford; with five hundred fair-haired warriors at his back, two-edged axe on shoulder and two-edged sword on thigh. His ships drove a thriving trade with France and Spain in Irish fish, butter, honey, and furs. His workmen coined money in the old round tower of Dundory, built by his predecessor and namesake about the year 1003, which stands as Reginald's tower to this day. He had fought many a bloody battle since his death at Clontarf, by the side of his old leader Sigtryg Silkbeard. He had been many a time to Dublin to

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

"That is my desire, mademoiselle. A thousand thanks for the permission. I have your leave to speak. Is it not?" she said in a quick, natural way. "Certainly," said I. "Mademoiselle, you are so amiable! Listen then, if you please. I have left my Lady. We could not agree. My Lady is so high, so very high. Pardon! Mademoiselle, you are right!" Her quickness anticipated what I might have said presently but as yet had only thought. "It is not for me to come here to complain of my Lady. But I say she is so high, so very high. I will not say a word more. All the world knows that." "Go on, if you please," said I. "Assuredly; mademoiselle, I am thankful for your politeness. Mademoiselle, I have an inexpressible desire to find service with a young lady who is good, accomplished, beautiful. You are good, accomplished, and beautiful as an angel. Ah, could I have the honour of being your domestic!" "I am sorry " I began. "Do not dismiss me so soon, mademoiselle!" she said with an involuntary contraction of her fine black eyebrows. "Let me hope a moment! Mademoiselle, I know this service would be more retired than that which I have quitted. Well! I wish that. I know this service would be less distinguished than that which I have quitted. Well!I wish that, I know that I should win less, as to wages here. Good.I am content." "I assure you," said I, quite embarrassed by the mere idea of having such an attendant, "that I keep no maid " "Ah, mademoiselle, but why not? Why not, when you can have one so devoted to you! Who would be enchanted to serve you; who would be so true, so zealous, and so faithful every day! Mademoiselle, I wish with all my heart to serve you. Do not speak of money at present. Take me as I am. For nothing!" She was so singularly earnest that I drew back, almost afraid of her. Without appearing to notice it, in her ardour she still pressed herself upon me, speaking in a rapid subdued voice, though always with a certain grace and propriety. "Mademoiselle, I come from the South country where we are quick and

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Серьезной проблемой, которая может возникнуть в период высадки рассады табака в поле, является ухудшение погодных условий, препятствующих проведению мероприятия в оптимальные сроки, в результате чего происходит вытягивание растений. Приостановка роста табака важна и для поэтапной высадки рассады в поле. Конечно, можно проводить посев табака в разные сроки для высадки в разные сроки, однако установлено, что поздние посевы часто совпадают с высокими температурами воздуха, которые способствуют пересыханию парникового грунта, что губительно влияет на нежные всходы табака. Поэтому целесообразнее высевать табак раньше и при необходимости сдерживать его рост. В целях предотвращения перерастания рассады рекомендовано применять ретарданты. Данные препараты являются регуляторами роста химического происхождения, действие которых проявляется в ингибировании линейного роста стеблей, уменьшении вытягивания междоузлий. Данный механизм является противоположным влиянию фитогормонов гиббереллинов. На фоне замедления роста растения, укорачивания и утолщения, т.е. повышения прочности стебля, отмечено увеличение количества придаточных корней, что повышает устойчивость растений к неблагоприятным факторам внешней среды, особенно это важно для пересадочной культуры в период приживания в поле, к которой и принадлежит табак.
Ретардантными свойствами обладает около тысячи химических соединений, большинство из которых относят к 4-м группам веществ. Четвертичные ониевые соединения, среди которых наиболее популярен хлормекватхлорид или хлорхолинхлорид (ТУР или ССС) и морфол, ретардантный эффект которых обусловлен способностью прерывать биосинтез гиббереллинов у зерновых культур. Механизм действия производных гидразина не связан с влиянием на синтез гиббереллинов, а обусловлен подавлением гормональной активности. Препараты группы производных триазола блокируют биосинтез гиббереллинов. Этиленпродуцирующие препараты не прерывают биосинтез гиббереллина, но их действие связано с антигиббереллиновым эффектом.
Одно из распространенных направлений использования ретардантов как в нашей стране, так и за рубежом – это предотвращение полегания зерновых культур. Применяют ретарданты ЦеЦеЦе 750, Моддус, Spermine и Paclobutrazol до фазы появления колоса. Обработки ретардантом, например препаратом Фоликур, применяют для повышения урожайности и перезимовки растений озимого рапса. Целенаправленно, для повышения качества сырья лекарственных растений (ромашки аптечной, змееголовника молдавского, пажитника сенного) применяют ретардант нового поколения Харди на основе эпибрассинолидов и α-дифенолов, являющихся естественными для растений соединениями. При этом в сырье не накапливаются несвойственные данному виду растений химические соединения, отмечено увеличение урожайности семян и повышение выхода эфирного масла. Также распространено применение ретардантов на рассадных культурах.
Например, опрыскивание растений томатов препаратом ТУР уменьшает высоту растений на 15–22%, усиливает рост корневой системы. При этом отмечено повышение содержания хлорофилла в листьях, что положительно сказывается при адаптации томатов к пониженной интенсивности света в пленочных теплицах. Цветение растений ускоряется на 7–8 сут, увеличивается число бутонов, цветков, завязей. Ранний урожай томатов повышается в 2–3 раза, а общий – на 18–22%. Для исследований на табаке был взят ретардант Атлет, ВР (д.в. хлормекватхлорид 600 г/л, ООО фирма “Зеленая Аптека Садовода”, Россия) из препарата фирмы “Рокита-Агро С.А.” (Польша), который рекомендован к применению на капусте, декоративных кустарниках и цветочных культурах, а также на рассаде томата, перца, баклажана. Препарат замедляет рост растений в высоту, способствует формированию растений с толстыми стеблями, темно-зелеными листьями и мощными корнями, а также раннему цветению и плодоношению. Ретардант относится к 3-му классу опасности (умеренно опасные), безопасен для пчел и полезной микрофлоры почвы.
Кроме регуляторов роста замедление роста растений может достигаться с помощью удобрений. Современные агрохимикаты так же, как и природные ретарданты, способны минимально накапливаться в почве и растениях и улучшать качество продукции. По данным производителя, фосфорно-калийное удобрение Cultifort Raiz (Культифорт Раиз) способствует развитию корневой системы, а также сокращению длины междоузлий и предотвращению перерастания растений.
Рекомендован для применения на колосовых, при этом регулирует рост стеблей, предупреждая их полегание, повышает их продуктивность. Относится к 4-му классу опасности (мало опасные). Произведен в Испании.
Rexolin ABC (Рексолин) – уникальное микроудобрение (Акзо Нобель, Нидерланды) рекомендовано для предпосевной обработки семян и проведения некорневых подкормок. В состав удобрения входят следующие микроэлементы: MgO – 9, CO2 – 7, Fe – 4, B – 0.5, Mo – 0.1, Cu – 4, Zn – 1.5, Co – 0.03%. Ранее удобрение, при подборе эффективных доз для применения на табаке проявило ретардантные свойства, поэтому использовано в опыте в качестве эталона. На данный момент агрохимикат не входит в список разрешенных препаратов для применения на территории РФ.
Поэтому цель работы – изучение влияния ретардантов на рост, развитие, продуктивность табака и качество сырья для включения в технологию его выращивания.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Исследование проводили в парниковом хозяйстве и на опытно-селекционном участке ВНИИТТИ (г. Краснодар) в 2020–2021 гг. на сорте табака Трапезонд 25. Посев и выращивание рассады осуществляли в парнике на питательной смеси с 50%-ной обеспеченностью основными питательными элементами (N35P30K35) от оптимального содержания. Данная питательная смесь являлась фоном и контролем в опыте. Влияние регулятора роста Атлет и удобрения Cultifort Raiz на табачные растения изучали в рассадный и полевой периоды. Рассаду опрыскивали в фазах “ушки” (за 17–20 сут до выборки) и “годная к высадке рассада” (за 7–10 сут до выборки) при двукратном внесении и в фазе “годная к высадке рассада” (за 7–10 сут до выборки) при однократном внесении. Ретардант Атлет испытывали в дозах 2.5, 3.0 и 3.5 мл/м2, удобрение Cultifort Raiz – в дозе 3.0 мл/м2. В качестве эталона использовали препарат Rexolin ABC в дозе 3.0 г/м2. Внесение эталона проводили за 7–10 сут до выборки рассады. Обработку препаратами осуществляли рабочими растворами (1 л/м2) с помощью лейки. Площадь учетной делянки 1 м2, повторность четырехкратная. Влияние ретардантов на табачную рассаду определяли по ее биометрическим показателям перед высадкой в поле. Степень развития корневой системы растений устанавливали по способности удерживать питательную смесь по методу Еремеева. Пролонгированное влияние ретардантов, примененных в рассадный период, изучали по измерениям высоты растений, площади листьев среднего яруса и урожайности табака. В конце вегетационного периода учитывали количество семенных продуктивных растений (соцветия с побуревшими коробочками). Подсчитывали количество растений нормально развитых и недоразвитых (высотой <50 см) на каждой делянке.
Накопление сухого вещества в табачном сырье на фоне проведения обработок ретардантами определяли по следующей формуле. Для исследования берут высечки из 10-ти табачных листьев диаметром 12 см, взвешивают, измельчают, затем после высушивания навеску опять взвешивают. Оценку химического состава табачного сырья осуществляли в лаборатории химии и контроля качества ВНИИТТИ. Содержание водорастворимых углеводов определяли в сухом табачном сырье по Бертрану (модификация лаборатории химии и контроля качества ВНИИТТИ), белкового азота по Мору, общего азота по Кьельдалю, никотина – спектрометрическим методом. Для проверки достоверности полученных данных использовали методы статистической обработки результатов с применением компьютерной программы однофакторного дисперсионного анализа Microsoft Excel. Погодные условия в годы исследования были разными. Вегетационный период 2020 г. можно охарактеризовать как экстремальный с недобором почвенной влаги. Однако весна была теплой. По температурному режиму март после посева табака, был теплее среднемноголетней нормы на 6.8°С, что положительно влияло на дружную всхожесть семян. Также превышение среднемноголетней нормы температурного режима отмечено в апреле и мае, что также благоприятно повлияло на процесс выращивания рассады табака в защищенном грунте. Температура в апреле превышала среднемноголетние показатели на 0.8°С, в мае на 1.9°С. Высаженная в поле рассада в конце мая отреагировала на недобор почвенной влаги на 2.8 мм изреживанием и угнетением посадок табака. В июне продолжались экстремальные условия для табачных растений, отмечено превышение температурной среднемноголетней нормы на 3.9°С, а дефицит влаги составил 44.1 мм (что меньше среднемноголетних показателей почти в 2 раза). В этот период проводили искусственный полив растений табака. В июле ситуация изменилась, выпавшие атмосферные осадки с превышением среднемноголетней нормы на 98.1 мм способствовали активному росту растений табака, температура превысила норму на 3.2°С. Погодные условия августа и сентября отмечены также как экстремальные, с недобором почвенной влаги и превышением среднемноголетней температурной нормы. Несмотря на малоблагоприятные погодные условия 2020 г., урожай табачного сырья получен высокий.
Метеорологические условия вегетационного периода 2021 г. определены как благоприятные в связи с оптимальной влажностью почвы в период проведения опыта. Посев табака осуществлен в конце марта, и были получены дружные всходы, т.к. по температурному режиму этот месяц оказался теплее средней многолетней нормы на 1.9°С. В апреле среднемесячная температура превысила среднемноголетнюю норму на 1.6°С.
Все это положительно отразилось на росте рассады табака. В мае месяце, когда производили посадку табака, отмечена дождливая погода. Среднесуточная температура воздуха превысила среднемноголетние показатели на 2.6°С. Осадки выпадали на протяжении всего месяца. Они составили 108 мм, что было больше среднемноголетних показателей на 56.2 мм. Среднесуточная температура воздуха в июне превысила среднемноголетнюю норму на 2.5°С, осадков за месяц выпало больше месячной нормы на 44.4 мм. Это активизировало рост табачной рассады в поле.
По температурному режиму июль оказался теплее среднемноголетней нормы на 4.1°С, по количеству выпавших осадков отмечено увеличение от среднемноголетнего показателя на 10.0 мм. Но все осадки выпали в начале месяца, а следующие 2 декады были засушливыми. Все это сильно затормозило рост табака и способствовало развитию соцветий и раннему зацветанию некоторых растений. Начало августа также было засушливым и жарким, что ускорило созревание табачных листьев. Во 2-й декаде месяца выпали осадки и началась 2-я фаза роста растений, не вошедших в фазу цветения. Данные условия позволили получить к концу вегетационного периода относительно высокий урожай сырья. Температура в августе превышала среднемноголетние показатели на 3.6°С, а избыток влаги составил 21.6 мм. Сентябрь отмечен как благоприятный месяц с оптимальным количеством выпавших и распределенных по времени осадков на уровне среднемноголетней нормы с небольшим превышением на 18.7 мм и температурой в пределах среднемноголетних показателей.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

В опыте для отбора эффективных ретардантов, способных сдерживать рост рассады табака в защищенном грунте в случае сложившихся неблагоприятных погодных условий для высадки растений, а также для проведения поэтапной высадки рассады табака в поле, выделили варианты с применением препарата Атлет в дозе 3.0 мл/м2 при двукратной обработке (рис. 1) и в дозе 3.5 мл/м2 при однократной обработке. Испытанный регулятор роста при создавшихся благоприятных погодных условиях в весенний период способствовал снижению длины растений до точки роста на 7–17% и до конца вытянутых листьев по сравнению с контролем на 3–10% (табл. 1). Сокращение длины табачной рассады произошло из-за оттока питательных веществ из листьев в основание стебля, при этом диаметр стебля увеличился на 14–19, масса стеблей – на 4–11, масса корней – на 44–50%. Возросла на 61–100% способность корневой системы удерживать питательную смесь. Выход стандартной рассады в вариантах опыта с испытанием ретарданта Атлет на 5–6% повысился в сравнении с контролем. Также ретардантный эффект отмечен при однократном применении удобрения Cultifort Raiz в дозе 3.0 мл/м2, при этом показано снижение высоты растений до точки роста на 8% и до конца вытянутых листьев – на 2%. Диаметр стебля превысил контроль на 5%. Масса стеблей увеличилась на 8%. Отмечена активная стимуляция развития корневой системы: масса корней превысила контроль на 68%, масса почвы по удерживающей способности корней увеличилась на 118%. Стандартной рассады в данном варианте опыта получено на 2% больше чем в контроле. Варианты с применением препаратов Атлет и Cultifort Raiz приблизились по описанным параметрам на уровень препарата Рексолин, являвшегося эталоном в данном опыте. Определено, что длина растений до точки роста сократилась на 12, длина растений до конца вытянутых листьев – на 7% в сравнении с контролем. Диаметр стебля увеличился на 14, масса стеблей – на 5, масса корневой системы – на 40%. Препарат Атлет, примененный в минимальной дозе 2.5 мл/м2 (при однократной и двукратной обработке), проявил к табаку небольшой стимулирующий эффект. Доза препарата Атлет 3.5 мл/м2 при двукратной обработке и удобрение Cultifort Raiz при двукратной обработке (3.0 мл/м2) угнетали растения табака, при этом значительно сокращалась доля выхода стандартных растений с запланированной парниковой площади. Несмотря на полученные отрицательные данные в нескольких вариантах вся рассада, отобранная для биометрических измерений, входила по параметрам в размеры, предусмотренные стандартом, а в лучших вариантах даже превышала их (табл. 1).
После высадки табака в поле, на учетных делянках сохранялся ретардантный эффект в течение 45 сут независимо от погодных условий. Практически все растения по высоте в этот период находились на уровне или меньше контрольных без обработки. Затем в фазе интенсивного роста отмечали стимуляцию роста растений во всех вариантах и положительное влияние обработок на формирование урожайности. Среди испытанных препаратов лучший результат получен при применении препарата Атлет в дозе 3 мл/м2 при двукратной обработке. В этом случае на фоне увеличения высоты растений к концу учетного периода на 13, количества листьев – на 13 и площади табачных листьев – на 13% получен дополнительный урожай табачного сырья в размере 6.2 ц/га, т.е. прибавка урожайности составила 21% (табл. 2). Хорошие показатели установлены и в варианте с применением ретарданта Атлет в дозе 3.5 мл/м2 при однократной обработке. При применении редартантов по данной схеме получен дополнительный урожай табачного сырья в количестве 5.4 ц/га (18%) на фоне повышения высоты растений на 13, увеличении количества листьев на 10 и площади листьев на 12%. Применение удобрения Cultifort Raiz в дозе 3.0 мл/м2 (однократно), показавшего в рассадный период оптимальные результаты, привело к увеличению высоты растений к концу вегетации на 6, количества листьев на растении – на 6, площади табачных листьев – на 10% и урожайности – на 3.9 ц/га (на 13%). Примененный в качестве эталона специальный комплекс микроэлементов Rexolin ABC обеспечил самую высокую прибавку урожайности – 9 ц/га (30%) на фоне увеличения всех показателей продуктивности табака.
В ходе исследования также отмечено, что ретарданты во всех испытанных дозах положительно влияли на семенную продуктивность растений, при этом количество растений в вариантах опыта с созревшими семенами находилось либо на уровне контроля, либо было больше. Повлияли ретарданты и на развитие растений. Например, максимальное количество недоразвитых растений (высотой меньше 50 см) – 12%, отмечено в варианте опыта с применением препарата Атлет в дозе 3.5 мл/м2 при двукратной обработке (табл. 3). Стоит отметить, что именно в этом варианте получено минимальное количество стандартной рассады.
Важным показателем спелости табака, определяющим величину и качество урожая, является его материальность, зависящая от накопления сухого вещества (масса веществ, входящих в состав табака, за исключением воды) в технически зрелых листьях. В опыте с применением ретардантов в рассаднике показано, что накопление сухого вещества в листьях в основном в опытных вариантах увеличивалось в среднем на 3–28%, при этом максимум установлен в эталонном варианте после обработки растений удобрением Rexolin ABC (табл. 4). В вариантах с двукратной обработкой препаратом Атлет в дозе 3.0 мл/м2 и в дозе 3.5 мл/м2 при однократной обработке, содержание сухого вещества в табачном сырье превысило уровень контроля на 10–17%.
К сухому веществу относятся основные химические вещества, от долевого содержания и соотношения которых определяются курительные достоинства табачного сырья и курительных изделий, изготовленных из него. К ним относятся никотин, общий и белковый азот, углеводы и др. Обработки ретардантами в период выращивания рассады несколько улучшили качество сырья. В опытном сырье отмечено увеличение растворимых углеводов и, следовательно, это проявляется повышением числа Шмука (углеводно-белковым соотношением), являющимся общепризнанным показателем оценки качества табака по его химическому составу. Углеводно-белковое соотношение варьирует от сотых долей до единицы у низкокачественных табаков и до 3 и выше у высококачественных. Средний по качеству табак характеризуется углеводно-белковым соотношением близким к единице. Ретардантные обработки способствовали повышению числа Шмука от 1.00 до 1.18, что свидетельствовало об улучшении качества табачного сырья. В контрольном варианте число Шмука составило 0.96 (табл. 5). При применении удобрений в качестве ретардантов отмечено повышение содержания никотина в табачном сырье, т.е. его крепости.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Таким образом, в результате двухлетнего исследования определено, что при неблагоприятных погодных условиях для высадки табака в поле целесообразно однократное применение ретарданта Атлет (в дозе 3.5 мл/м2) или агрохимиката Cultifort Raiz (в дозе 3.0 мл/м2) за 7–10 сут до предполагаемой выборки рассады табака в виде водного раствора объемом 1 л/м2, способствующее приостановке роста растений табака. В случае проведения поэтапной высадки рассады рекомендовано двукратное применение ретарданта Атлет (в дозе 3.0 мл/м2) за 17–20 и 7–10 сут до предполагаемой выборки рассады табака. Ретардантный эффект испытанных препаратов проявлялся выраженным снижением длины растений до точки роста на 7–17, до конца вытянутых листьев – на 2–10, увеличением диаметра стебля на 5–19, массы стеблей – на 4–11, массы корней – на 44–68, способности корневой системы удерживать питательную смесь – на 61–118, повышением выхода стандартных растений – на 2–6, площади листьев в полевой период – на 10–13, урожайности табачного сырья – на 13–21% и курительных достоинств табачного сырья.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Nuclear Energy in France
Nuclear energy is the cornerstone of french energy policy. In the ‘70s France chose to develop nuclear as its base load electricity source as a response to the oil crisis and assure its energy independence.
Nuclear Electricity Production: France currently counts 58 commercial nuclear reactors in operation responsible for producing 80% of French domestic electricity. As a comparison, the 104 US reactors produces 20% of US electricity.Despite scarce natural resources, France has reached an energy independence of 50% thanks to its strategic choice for nuclear energy.
Environment: As well as providing safe and reliable energy, nuclear helps to reduce French greenhouse gas emissions by avoiding the release of 31 billions tones of carbon dioxide (contrary to coal or gas generation) and making France the less carbon emitting country within the OECD. As a leader in nuclear energy, France has developed clean technology for radioactive waste disposal. Reprocessing currently allows France to recover valuable elements from spent fuels and permit a significant reduction of high level waste and lead to safer and optimized containment, for final radioactive waste disposition. French nuclear power plants produces only 10 g/year/inhabitant of highly radioactive waste.
International Cooperation and research: France is one of the forerunner in nuclear research and participates in numerous international cooperation programs alongside the United States such as the development of the next generation of nuclear power plants (Gen IV) and the International Thermonuclear Experimental Reactor (ITER) that will be built in Cadarache, South of France.
The French Atomic Energy Commission (CEA)
The French Atomic Energy Commission is a public body established in October 1945 by General de Gaulle. It constitutes a power of expertise and proposition for the authorities. A leader in research, development and innovation, the CEA is involved in three main fields:
It develops and acquires the technological building blocks necessary to the development of the nuclear reactors of the future (Contribution to Generation IV and GNEP research),
It contributes to reducing greenhouse gas emission with its research on hydrogen, fuel cells, biomass, energy storage…,
It supports the nuclear utilities in France by optimizing the nuclear power plants of the French nuclear fleet and by optimizing the fuel cycle,
It offers safe and economically viable technical solutions for managing nuclear waste,
It conducts fundamental research in climate and environmental sciences, high energy physics, astrophysics, fusion, nanosciences…
Information and Health technologies:
It tackles micro and nano-technologies for telecommunication and nuclear medicine for radiotherapy and medical imaging,
It researches programs on biotechnology, molecular labelling, biomolecular engineering and structural biology,
It shares its knowledge and know-how through education and training through the National Institute for Nuclear Sciences and Technologies (INSTN),
It manages over 300 priority patents and is active in the creation of clusters.
Defense and National Security:
It conceives, builds, maintains then dismantles the nuclear warhead of the French deterrence force,
It helps to fight against nuclear, biological and chemical weapons (NRBC program).
The missions of the CEA are similar to the Department of Energy in the United States. The CEA has a network of counselor or representatives in French Embassies around the world (see joint map).
The French Nuclear Safety Authority (ASN)
Created in 2006, from the former DSIN (Directorate for the Safety of Nuclear Facilities), the French Nuclear Safety Authority is an independent administrative authority which is tasked with regulating nuclear safety and radiation protection in order to protect workers, patients, the public and the environment from the risks involved in nuclear activities. It also contributes to informing the public. Like the Nuclear Regulatory Commission in the United States, it carries out inspections and may pronounce sanctions, up to and including suspension of operation of an installation.
French Institute for Radioprotection and Nuclear Safety (IRSN)
Created in 2001 by merging the Protection and Nuclear Safety Institute (IPSN) and the Ionizing radiations Protection Office (OPRI), the Institute for Radioprotection and Nuclear Safety is a public establishment of an industrial and commercial nature placed under the joint authority of the Ministries of the Environment, Health, Industry, Research and Defense. It is the expert in safety research and specialized assessments into nuclear and radiological risk serving public authorities whose work is complementary to the ASN.
Its scope of activities includes:
environment and response,
human radiological protection,
research on the prevention of major accidents,
power reactor safety,
fuel cycle facility safety,
research installation safety,
waste management safety;
nuclear defense expertise.
National radioactive Waste Management Agency (ANDRA)
Created in 1991, the French National Agency for Radioactive Waste Management is a public industrial and commercial organization that operates independently of waste producers. It is responsible for the long-term management of radioactive waste produced in France under the supervision of the French Ministries for Energy, Research and the Environment. It can be compared to a certain extent to the Office for Nuclear Waste of the Department of Energy in the United States.
Andra also pursues industrial, research, and information activities as it designs and implements disposal solutions suited to each category of radioactive waste:
the collection, conditioning, disposal of radioactive waste from small producers (hospitals, research centers, industry),
specification of waste packages for disposal,
disposal in suited sites,
monitoring of closed disposal facilities,
research programs for long-lived and high level activity waste, especially through the operation of an underground research laboratory in a deep clay formation…
General Directorate for Energy and Climate (DGEC)
The General Directorate for Energy and Climate represents the government and is part of the Office of the Department for Ecology and Sustainable Development. It defines the French nuclear policy. The DGEC takes care of the energy supply, the security of supply, oil refining and logistics, nuclear industry, and coal and mines.
Consequently, its activities include:
the design and implement energy and raw material supply policy,
to ensure opening of electricity and gas markets,
track key energy and raw material sectors,
to oversee enterprises and public institutions in energy sector,
to ensure compliance with rules and regulations governing energy sector,
to participate in European and international energy projects and working groups,
to provide economic, environmental, and fiscal expertise on energy matters.
The Rise of Nuclear Power Generation in France.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Angola is a giant jigsaw puzzle of different climates, landscapes, cultures and colors. From mountains to vast open plains, wide white beaches to thick tropical rainforest, Angola has it all, as if each of its eighteen provinces were a different country. Lubango has a mild temperate climate, Luanda is hot and dry, while Cabinda is steamy and tropical. Much of the landscape is dramatic, with plunging waterfalls, bizarre rock formations and deep gorges.
With an Atlantic coastline stretching for over 1.650 kms, Angola has mighty rivers flowing into wide estuaries depositing sediments from the high plateaus to form numerous small islands, bays and sandbanks.
In Angola, you can encounter a diversity of wild animals: lions, hyenas, elephants and antelopes. Apes, hippopotamuses and crocodiles are also indigenous to this country. In the Namib Desert, which is situated in the south-west, you can find the tumboa, a unique plant with two wide leaves that are several metres long and lie on the ground of the desert.
Although the climate is such that the beaches can be visited all year round, it is in fact during the hot season that they are most frequented. The bars all filled and the local music and dancing provide an animated and exotic atmosphere that mixes well with the mystery of the African nights.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

United Nations Special Commission
United Nations Special Commission (UNSCOM) was an inspection regime created by the United Nations to ensure Iraq's compliance with policies concerning Iraqi production and use of weapons of mass destruction after the Gulf War. Between 1991 and 1997 its director was Rolf Ekéus; from 1997 to 1999 its director was Richard Butler.
United Nations Special Commission (UNSCOM) was an inspection regime created with the adoption of United Nations Security Council Resolution 687 in April 1991 to oversee Iraq's compliance with the destruction of Iraqi chemical, biological, and missile weapons facilities and to cooperate with the International Atomic Energy Agency’s efforts to eliminate nuclear weapon facilities all in the aftermath of the Gulf War. The UNSCOM inspection regime was packaged with several other UN Security Council requirements, namely, that Iraq’s ruling regime formally recognize Kuwait as an independent state and pay out war reparations for the destruction inflicted in the Gulf War, including the firing of Kuwaiti oil supplies and destruction of public infrastructure. Until the UN Security Council saw that Iraq’s weapons programs had been aborted and Iraqi leaders had allowed monitoring systems to be installed, the UN’s aforementioned sanctions would continue to be imposed on Iraq.
The commission found corroborating evidence that Rihab Rashid Taha, an Iraqi microbiologist educated in England, had produced biological weapons for Iraq in the 1980s. The destruction of proscribed weapons and the associated facilities was carried out mainly by Iraq, under constant supervision by UNSCOM.
Inspectors withdrew in 1998, and disbanded the following year amid allegations that the United States had used the commission's resources to spy on the Iraqi military. Weapons inspector Scott Ritter later stated that Operation Rockingham had cherry-picked evidence found by the United Nations Special Commission; evidence, he says, that was later used as part of the casus belli for the 2003 invasion of Iraq.
The successor of the United Nations Special Commission was the United Nations Monitoring, Verification and Inspection Commission.
The United Nations Special Commission (UNSCOM) was headed by Rolf Ekéus and later Richard Butler. During several visits to Iraq by the United Nations Special Committee (UNSCOM), set up after the 1990 invasion of Kuwait to inspect Iraqi weapons facilities, weapons inspectors were told by Rihab Rashid Taha that the al-Hakam germ warfare center was a chicken-feed plant. "There were a few things that were peculiar about this animal-feed production plant," Charles Duelfer, UNSCOM's deputy executive chairman, later told reporters, "beginning with the extensive air defenses surrounding it."
The powers given to UNSCOM inspectors in Iraq were: “unrestricted freedom of movement without advance notice in Iraq”; the “right to unimpeded access to any site or facility for the purpose of the on-site inspection...whether such site or facility be above or below ground”; “the right to request, receive, examine, and copy any record data, or information...relevant to” UNSCOM’s activities; and the “right to take and analyze samples of any kind as well as to remove and export samples for off-site analysis.
Acceptance of the intrusion of the UNSCOM’s inspectors on the part of the Iraqi regime was slow coming. But with the threat of punitive military action looming from the international community, and particularly the U.S., Saddam Husain begrudgingly allowed UNSCOM’s inspectors into the country to begin their work.
Between 1991 and 1995, UN inspectors uncovered a massive program to develop biological and nuclear weapons. A large amount of equipment was confiscated and destroyed. Iraq by and large refused to cooperate with UNSCOM and its inspections as mandated by UN SC Res. 687 until June 1992, ten months after deadline, at which time the Iraqi government submitted “full, final and complete reports” on all of its weapons of mass destruction programs. These reports, however, were found to be incomplete and deficient, and at the same time UN inspectors were subjected to harassment and threats on the part of the Iraqi regime.
United Nations Security Council Resolution 699 was also passed in 1991, declaring that Iraq was responsible for all funding of UNSCOM’s inspections in Iraq.
In 1995, UNSCOM's principal weapons inspector Dr. Rod Barton showed Taha documents obtained by UNSCOM from Israel that showed the Iraqi government had just purchased 10 tons of growth media from a British company called Oxoid. Growth media is a mixture of sugar, proteins and minerals that allows microscopic life to grow. It is used in hospitals, where swabs from patients are placed in dishes containing growth media for diagnostic purposes. Iraq's hospital consumption of growth media was just 200 kg a year; yet in 1988, Iraq imported 39 tons of it.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Shown this evidence by UNSCOM, Taha admitted to inspectors that she had grown 19,000 litres of botulism toxin; 8,000 litres of anthrax; 2,000 litres of aflatoxins, which can cause liver cancer; clostridium perfringens, a bacterium that can cause gas gangrene; and ricin, a castor bean derivative which can kill by inhibiting protein synthesis. She also admitted conducting research into cholera, salmonella, foot and mouth disease, and camel pox, a disease that uses the same growth techniques as smallpox, but which is safer for researchers to work with. It was because of the discovery of Taha's work with camel pox that the US and British intelligence services feared Saddam Hussein may have been planning to weaponize the smallpox virus. Iraq had a smallpox outbreak in the 1970s and UNSCOM scientists believe the government would have retained contaminated material.
UNSCOM learned that, in August 1990, after Iraq's invasion of Kuwait, Taha's team was ordered to set up a program to weaponize the biological agents. By January 1991, a team of 100 scientists and support staff had filled 157 bombs and 16 missile warheads with botulin toxin, and 50 bombs and five missile warheads with anthrax. In an interview with the BBC, Taha denied the Iraqi government had weaponized the bacteria. "We never intended to use it," she told journalist Jane Corbin of the BBC's Panorama program. "We never wanted to cause harm or damage to anybody." UNSCOM found the munitions dumped in a river near al-Hakam. UNSCOM also discovered that Taha's team had conducted inhalation experiments on donkeys from England and on beagles from Germany. The inspectors seized photographs showing beagles having convulsions inside sealed containers.
The al-Hakam germ warfare center, headed by the British-educated Iraqi biologist Dr. Rihab Rashid Taha, was blown up by UNSCOM in 1996. According to a 1999 report from the U.S. Defense Intelligence Agency, the normally mild-mannered Taha exploded into violent rages whenever UNSCOM questioned her about al-Hakam, shouting, screaming and, on one occasion, smashing a chair, while insisting that al-Hakam was a chicken-feed plant.
Iraq charged that the commission was a cover for US espionage and refused UNSCOM access to certain sites, such as Baath Party headquarters. Although Ekéus has said that he resisted attempts at such espionage, many allegations have since been made against the agency commission under Butler, charges which Butler has denied. Within the UN establishment in Iraq, UNSCOM was not without its critics, with the UN's humanitarian staff informally calling the inspectors 'UN-Scum'. In return, the UN's humanitarian staff were called "bunny-huggers".
Also in 1996, the Iraqi ruling regime agreed to the terms of United Security Council Resolution 986, an oil-for-supplies agreement in which Iraq was allowed to sell $2 billion worth of oil every six months as a ways to purchase supplies for its increasingly impoverished and malnourished population. This agreement also allowed the UN to oversee the use and management of oil revenues, and to see that some of the funds went to pay war reparations and for the work of UNSCOM in Iraq during this period. The distribution of supplies purchased with oil revenues was also to be supervised by UN inspectors to ensure fair and equal distribution throughout the Iraqi population.
 1998 Airstrikes
Security Council Meeting On the evening of 15 December 1998 the Security Council convened to consider two letters from weapons inspectors. The IAEA report by Mohamed El Baradei stated that Iraq "has provided the necessary level of cooperation to enable... [our] activities to be completed efficiently and effectively". The UNSCOM report, authored by Richard Butler, deplored the restrictions, lack of disclosure, and concealment. While conceding that "[i]n statistical terms, the majority of the inspections of facilities and sites under the ongoing monitoring system were carried out with Iraq's cooperation," his letter listed a number of instances where unspecificed "undeclared dual-capable items" had been discovered, and where inspections had been held up so that buildings could be cleared of sensitive material.
Since Operation Desert Fox had already begun at the time of the meeting (just hours after the inspectors had been evacuated), the Security Council debated about who was to blame for the military action, rather than whether they should authorize it. The Iraqi representative said:
|“||I speak to you now while rockets and bombs are falling on the cities and the villages of Iraq... At a time when the Security Council... was discussing [the] reports..., and before the Council reached any conclusion on this subject, the United States and Britain launched their attack against Iraq. The two Powers requested a suspension of the informal meeting of the Security Council and their pretext for aggression was that one of the two reports -- the UNSCOM report -- emphasized the lack of full cooperation by Iraq with UNSCOM... Time and again we have warned against the partiality and lack of objectivity of the United Nations Special Commission... The UNSCOM Executive Chairman singled out in his report yesterday five incidents out of a total of 300 inspection operations... The exaggerated uproar about Iraqi weapons of mass destruction is nothing but a great lie.||”|
The Russian ambassador added:
|“||We believe that although there are certain problems..., the current crisis was created artificially... On the night of 15 December this year, [Butler] presented a report that gave a distorted picture of the real state of affairs and concluded that there was a lack of full cooperation on the part of Iraq. That conclusion was not borne out by the facts. Without any consultations with the Security Council, Richard Butler then evacuated the entire Special Commission staff from Iraq. At the same time, there was an absolutely unacceptable leak of the report to the communications media, which received the text before the members of the Security Council themselves... It is symbolic that precisely at the time when Richard Butler... was attempting to defend the conclusions reached in his report, we were informed about the strike against Iraq, and the justification for that unilateral act was precisely the report which had been presented by the Executive Chairman of the Special Commission.||”|
The view of the Council was split, with several countries placing the responsibility on Iraq. The United States declared that "Iraq's policy of unremitting defiance and non-compliance necessitated the resort to military force". The United Kingdom stated that the objectives of the action were "to degrade Iraq's capability to build and use weapons of mass destruction, and to diminish the military threat Iraq poses to its neighbours. The targets chosen, therefore, are targets connected with his military capability, his weapons of mass destruction and his ability to threaten his neighbours."
 1999: End of UNSCOM
In December 1999, the UN Security Council passed Resolution 1284, replacing UNSCOM with the United Nations Monitoring, Verification and Inspection Commission. Four countries — among them Russia, France and China — abstained from voting on Res. 1284, which led the Iraqi regime to reject the resolution because they saw the resolution as a way for the UN to claim Iraq as a “protectorate.”
UNSCOM’s intention of identifying and eliminating Iraqi weapons programs resulted in numerous successes, illustrating the “value of a system approach to biological arms verification,” as former UNSCOM Historian Stephen Black has written. But the overall effect of the UN sanctions on Iraqi in the 1990s proved devastating to an already crumbling country. Malnutrition rates among Iraqis increased and infant mortality rates soared, exacting a heavy toll on the people of Iraq not part of the ruling regime’s patrimonial “shadow state.”
 Allegations of CIA infiltration of UNSCOM
Evidence that UNSCOM had been used by US intelligence to penetrate Iraqi security and track President Saddam Hussein's movements emerged in January 1999. An investigation by the Washington Post claimed that CIA engineers, working as UN technicians, installed equipment to spy on Iraqi sites without Butler's knowledge, and that this explained the unidentified "burst transmissions" that had been noted by the inspectors.
Former UN weapons inspector Scott Ritter later accused some UNSCOM personnel of spying, and also alleged that the purpose of the spying was to target Saddam in the bombing. Butler, on the other hand, denied allegations that foreign intelligence agencies "piggybacked" UNSCOM and questioned the factual accuracy of several of Ritter's statements.
On 31 August 1998, Ritter said: "Iraq still has proscribed weapons capability. There needs to be a careful distinction here. Iraq today is challenging the special commission to come up with a weapon and say where is the weapon in Iraq, and yet part of their efforts to conceal their capabilities, I believe, have been to disassemble weapons into various components and to hide these components throughout Iraq. I think the danger right now is that without effective inspections, without effective monitoring, Iraq can in a very short period of time measure the months, reconstitute chemical biological weapons, long-range ballistic missiles to deliver these weapons, and even certain aspects of their nuclear weaponization program."
Almost a year later, in June 1999, Ritter responded to an interviewer saying: "When you ask the question, 'Does Iraq possess militarily viable biological or chemical weapons?' the answer is no! It is a resounding NO. Can Iraq produce today chemical weapons on a meaningful scale? No! Can Iraq produce biological weapons on a meaningful scale? No! Ballistic missiles? No! It is 'no' across the board. So from a qualitative standpoint, Iraq has been disarmed. Iraq today possesses no meaningful weapons of mass destruction capability.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Butler resigned from UNSCOM on 30 June 1999.
 See also
- In Shifting Sands: The Truth About Unscom and the Disarming of Iraq - documentary film directed by Scott Ritter
- Iraq disarmament crisis and Iraq disarmament timeline 1990–2003
- UNSCOM personnel: Rolf Ekéus, Richard Butler (diplomat), Charles A. Duelfer, Scott Ritter, Corinne Heraud, Alexander Coker
- United Nations Security Council Resolution 687 S-RES-687(1991) page 3 on 3 April 1991 (retrieved 2008-04-10)
- Zilinskas, Raymond A., “UNSCOM and the UNSCOM Experience in Iraq,” Politics and the Life Sciences, Vol. 14, No. 2 (Aug., 1995), 230-231
- Tripp, Charles, “A History of Iraq,” (New York: Cambridge University Press, 2008), 250
- What Happened to Saddam's WMD? Arms Control Today September, 2003
- Chief U.N. weapons inspector rejects spying allegations CNN January 6, 1999
- US silence on new Iraq spying allegations BBC News January 7, 1999
- Black, Stephen, “UNSCOM and the Iraqi Biological Weapons Program: Implications for Arms Control,” Politics and the Life Sciences,” Vol. 18, No. 1 (Mar., 1999), pp. 62-63
- Tripp, 250-251
- Zilinskas, 230
- "The Inspections Maze". Christian Science Monitor. 2002. Retrieved 2006-04-28.[dead link]
- "Baghdad prevents inspections at Baath party headquarters". Arabic News.com. 12/11/1998. Retrieved 2006-04-28.
- Wright, Susan (2002). Biological Warfare and Disarmament. Lanham: Rowman & Littlefield. p. 272. ISBN 0-7425-2469-8.
- Varadarajan, Siddharth (26 February 1998). "'UNSCUM' versus 'Bunny-huggers' in Iraq". The Times of India.
- Tripp, 252
- United Nations Security Council PV S-PV-3955 on 1998-12-16 (retrieved 2007-04-04)
- "LETTER DATED 15 DECEMBER 1998 FROM THE SECRETARY-GENERAL ADDRESSED TO THE PRESIDENT OF THE SECURITY COUNCIL". Un.org. Retrieved 2011-06-19.
- United Nations Security Council S-1998-1172 on 1998-12-15 (retrieved 2007-04-04)
- Julian Borger (17 December 1998). "Missile blitz on Iraq". The Guardian.
- United Nations Security Council PV S-PV-3955 page 2 on 1998-12-16 (retrieved 2007-04-04)
- United Nations Security Council PV S-PV-3955 page 3 on 1998-12-16 (retrieved 2007-04-04)
- United Nations Security Council PV S-PV-3955 page 8 on 1998-12-16 (retrieved 2007-04-04)
- United Nations Security Council PV S-PV-3955 page 5 on 1998-12-16 (retrieved 2007-04-04)
- Tripp, 269
- Black, 68
- Graham-Brown, Sarah, “Sanctioning Iraq: A Failed Policy, Middle East Report, No. 215 (Summer, 2000), pp. 8-10
- Halliday, Denis J., “The Impact of the UN Sanctions on the People of Iraq,” Journal of Palestine Studies, Vol. 28, No. 2 (Winter, 1999), pp. 29-33
- Mark Tran (7 January 1999). "UN 'spied on Iraq'". The Guardian.
- Barton Gellman (2 March 1999). "U.S. Spied On Iraq Via U.N". Washington Post.
- Julian Borger (3 March 1999). "UN 'kept in dark' about US spying in Iraq". The Guardian.
- "Unscom 'infiltrated by spies'". BBC News. March 23, 1999. Retrieved 2006-04-28.
- "The Lessons and Legacy of UNSCOM, an Interview with Ambassador Richard Butler". Arms Control Today. June 1999.
- Arons, Nicholas (June 24, 1999). "Interview with Scot Ritter". Federation of American Scientists, June 24, 1999. Retrieved 2008-09-06.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Quantum mechanics and general relativity are perhaps the two greatest
achievements of twentieth-century physics. However the two theories
are at odds: the standard recipe (quantum field theory) for quantizing
a classical field theory fails when applied to general relativity.
New ultraviolet divergences appear at every order in perturbation theory,
requiring an infinite number of counterterms for renormalization. This is
unacceptable: even if one could stomach a theory with an infinite number
of free parameters, it is doubtful that the resulting theory is stable and
unitary at the Planck scale.

This conflict is extremely fortunate for physicists.
A glance at the history of physics, depicted in Figure 1,
reveals that all
great leaps in our understanding of the universe originated
in such contradictions. For example, the ultraviolet catastrophe which
occurs in the thermodynamics of classical electromagnetism led to the
development of quantum mechanics.
\goodbreak
\topinsert
\centerline{\psfig{figure=qg.fig1}}
\endinsert
The last problem in this figure, quantum gravity, was
noted in the fifties by Pauli. It took
three decades to arrive at superstring theory, the first--and only--plausible
mathematical resolution of this problem to date. The basic idea is that all
particles, on closer inspection (${10^{-33}}\,\,{cm})$, are actually tiny
closed loops of string. Further, all the forces and particles of
nature (photons, quarks, etc.) are simply different vibrational modes
of the same fundamental string.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

What I would like to do today is reexamine the
question of whether topology
change can occur in classical (four dimensional)
general relativity. We will see that by
slightly extending our notion of what constitutes a solution to Einstein's
equation, there {\it do} exist topology changing solutions.
Furthermore, the extension we will need is strongly motivated by quantum ideas.

Let me begin by reviewing the standard arguments for why topology change
cannot occur in general relativity. First, there is the well known result of
Geroch\refto{ge}: Consider any spacetime containing
two spacelike surfaces $\S$ and $\S'$ of different topology.
(For simplicity I will assume $\S$ and $\S'$ are  compact,
so these are closed universes, but most of the results generalize to open
universes also.)  Geroch showed in 1967
that independent of any field equations, this spacetime must have either closed
timelike curves or singularities.  There is a second result which appears to
be less well known:
If one does impose Einstein's equation or even just the weak energy
condition, $T_{\mu\nu} l^\mu l^\nu > 0$ for all null $l^\mu$,
the situation is
worse. Tipler showed in 1977 that generic topology changing spacetimes are
singular\refto{ti}. Thus, even allowing closed timelike curves,
one cannot change topology
without creating singularities.

Faced with these results, people have generally followed one of two paths.
Some have given up the local energy condition and tried to make sense of the
resulting negative energy and causality violation\refto{sor}.
However, most people have
taken a second path, which is to give up on Lorentz metrics entirely and
adopt Euclidean techniques to describe topology
change\refto{hadeg,co,gs1,garstr}.
I would like to
follow a third path  which is to keep Lorentz metrics {\it and} the field
equations
and ask what kind of singularities
are required in order to change topology? The theorems show that if a metric
satisfies Einstein's equation on a topology changing manifold, then it cannot
be well defined everywhere.
We will see that the points at which the metric is ill defined
do not have to be
strong curvature singularities. The singularities
can be very mild. In fact, they can be
so mild that in some sense they are not there at all!

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

је оперативни систем састављен искључиво од слободног софтвера. Његов назив је рекурзивна скраћеница за „ није јуникс“ (). Ово је одабрано зато што је његов дизајн јуниксолик (), али од Јуникса се разликује по томе што је слободан софтвер и не садржи његов код. Развој -а је покренуо Ричард Столман, и то је био првобитни циљ Задужбине за слободни софтвер (Free Software Foundation).

Развој  система је значио и писање многих програма, познатих као  програми или  пакети. Међу њима су и уређивач текста Емакс, -ова збирка компилатора (GNU Compiler Collection), -ов дебагер (испитивач) (GNU Debugger) и графичко окружење Гном. 

 систем се обично користи у комбинацији са језгром линукс, које је развијено ван пројекта . Ова комбинација чини потпуно функционалан оперативни систем, ГНУ са линуксом (GNU/Linux), који се међутим често назива само „Линукс“. За детаље погледајте ГНУ и линукс - спор око имена.

-ови програми се често користе и самостално. Није неуобичајено наћи компоненте -а инсталисане на власничким јуникс системима уместо првобитних јуникс програма – посебно оних који су алатке за програмирање и који се често називају заједничким именом -ов скуп алатки. (Што је само мали део целине  система.) Користе се на овај начин јер су се показали као супериорни у односу на еквивалентне јуникс верзије, чак и онда када нису потпуно сагласни са стандардом POSIX. Такође, због популарности комбинације  са линуксом, многи који раде на развоју софтвера инсталишу -ов скуп алата на друге системе због компатибилности или зато што скуп ради уједначено на свим платформама. Многи -ови програми су такође пребачени () на Microsoft Windows, Мекинтош OS X и разне друге власничке платформе. Међутим, разлог за постојање портова (преноса, тј. и других верзија) је да помо да се ти системи замене слободним софтвером.

Пројекат  је јавно оглашен 27. септембра 1983. године на дискусионим групама net.unix-wizards и net.usoft. Прави рад на пројекту је почео 5. јануара следеће године, када је Столман дао оставку на МИТ-у да би избегао могућност да универзитет полаже било каква права или да омете расподелу (дистрибуцију) -а као слободног софтвера. Првобитна објава је праћена Столмановим „Манифестом -а“ и другим есејима у којима је изложио своје мотиве за пројекат , од којих је један био и „враћање духа сарадње који је преовлађивао у рачунарској заједници у њеним ранијим данима“.

Када је  предложен, власнички оперативни систем јуникс је већ био у широкој употреби. Будући да се архитектура јуникса показала технички стабилном, систем  је дизајниран тако да буде компатибилан са њим. Архитектура Јуникса је омогућавала да  буде написан од појединачних софтверских компоненти. Оне компоненте које су већ биле слободно доступне, као што су систем за прелом текста ТеК и графички систем Икс Windows ће бити прилагођене и поново искоришћене, док ће недостајуће бити написане од нуле.

Године 1985. Столман је основао непрофитну организацију Задужбину за слободан софтвер (ЗСС), да би пружала логистичку, правну и финансијску подршку пројекту . ЗСС такође запошљава и програмере да доприносе -у, мада је значајан део развоја био (и још увек је) дело добровољаца. Како се  све више истицао, тако су заинтересовани бизниси почели да доприносе развоју или продаји  софтвера и техничке подршке. Најистакнутији и најуспешнији од ових је био Сајс Солушнс (), данас део Ред Хета ().

Да би осигурао да  софтвер остане слободан, пројекат је 1989. године издао прву верзију -ове Опште јавне лиценце (-ова ОЈЛ, познатија по енглеској скраћеници ). Ову лиценцу данас користи највећи део  програма, као и велики број програма слободног софтвера који нису део пројекта ; то је једна од најчешће коришћених лиценци слободног софтвера на свету. Она даје право свима који приме програм да га покрећу, копирају, мењају и прерасподељују (дистрибуирају) а истовремено им брани да наметну даља ограничења на копије које они расподеле. Ова идеја се назива копилефт ().

До 1990. године, систем  је имао проширив уређивач текста (Емакс), врло успешан оптимизујући преводилац (компилатор) (GCC) као и већину основних библиотека и алатки једне стандардне јуникс дистрибуције. Главна компонента која је још увек недостајала је било језгро. У Манифесту -а, Столман је поменуо да „основе језгра постоје, али нам недостаје још особина до емулације јуникса“. Он је мислио на , језгро са удаљеним позивом поступка (), које је развијено на МИТ-у и чији су аутори одлучили да га расподељују бесплатно () а који је био компатибилан са верзијом 7. јуникса. У децембру 1986. почео је рад на прилагођавању овог језгра. Међутим, развојни тим је на крају одлучио да је оно бескорисно као почетна тачка зато што се могло покренути једино на „реткој и скупој 68000 платформи“ () и да би га зато требало портовати (пребацити, пренети) на друге платформе пре него што уопште буде коришћено. До 1988. је уместо њега разматрано Max (), језгро са слањем порука (), које је развијано на Универзитету Карнеги Мелон, мада је његово издање као слободног софтвера одложено до 1990. године, док развојни тим није уклонио код који је био власништво АТТ-а ().

Будући да је Мах обезбеђивало само најниже функције језгра, Пројекат  је морао да развије делове вишег нивоа језгра, и то као збирку корисничких програма. Ова збирка је првобитно требало да се зове Аликс (), али је касније развијачу () Мајклу Бушнелу () драже било део имена Крдо (), па је Аликс прво померено за име подсистема и на крају и коначно избачено. На крају се развој Крда отегао због техничких и сукоба личности.

Године 1991. Линус Торвалдс () је написао јуникс компатибилно језгро линукс. Мада првобитно није био слободан софтвер, Торвалдс је лиценцу променио на -ову ОЈЛ 1992. Линукс су даље развијали разни програмери преко Интернета. 1992. је комбиновано са  системом, што је за резултат имало потпуно функционалан слодобан оперативни систем.  систем се најчешће среће у овом облику, и обично се назива „систем -а са линуксом“ или „дистрибуцијом линукса“. Од 2005. Крдо је у спором развоју те је сада званично језгро  система. Постоји такође и пројекат који ради на преношењу  система на језгра -ја и -ја.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Део софтвера који је развијен у оквиру пројекта :
* Системски софтвер
** GNU bison - генератор рашчлањивача (parser generator) намењен као замена за yacc
** Bash - командна шкољка 
** BFD - библиотека објектних датотека
** Classpath - библиотеке за Јаву
** Coreutils - основне јуникс алатке, као што су cat, ls и rm
** Emacs - прошириви, самодокументујући уређивач текста
** glibc - POSIX стандардна библиотека за Це, са допунском функционалношћу

** gzip - библиотека и програм за компресију података
** ГНУ-ов алатни ланац за развој софтвера: 
*** GNU Binutils - асемблер (assembler), линкер (linker) и сродни алати
*** ГНУ-ов систем за градњу (GNU build system) - Automake, Autoconf, Libtool
*** GCC - оптимизирајући преводилац за многе програмске језике, укључујући Це, Це++, Фортран, Аду и Јаву
*** GDB - дебагер (debugger)
** GNU MDK - развојни комплет (development kit) за програмирање у MIX-у
** Screen - мултиплексор (multiplexer) терминала
** Texinfo - документациони систем за производњу мрежних (онлајн) и штампаних упутстава
** GNU wget - напредно добављање датотека са мрежа и Интернета
** GNUnet - децентрализована „peer-to-peer“ комуникациона мрежа дизајнирана да буде отпорна на цензуру
** DotGNU - замена за .NET
** GNU Hurd - скуп сервера утемељен на микрокернелу који обавља исте функције као и јуникс језгро
* Апликативни софтвер
** GIMP - -ов програм за манипулацију сликама ()
** GLPK - пакет намењен решавању проблема у линеарном програмирању (LP), mixed integer programming (MIP) и сличних.
** GMP - библиотека за нумеричке прорачуне у произвољној прецизности 
** Гном (GNOME) - графичко радно окружење
** GNU LilyPond - програм за писање нотних записа
** GNU Octave - програм за нумеричке прорачуне сличан MATLAB-у
** GNU Privacy Guard (GnuPG) - слободна алатка за енкрипцију која може да замени PGP
** GNU Robots - мала игра за рачунарске програмере
** GSL - -ова научна библиотека (GNU Scientific Library)
** GNUstep - изведба (имплементација) OpenStep стандарда за скуп библиотека и развојних алата за графичке апликације
** Guile - уградиви (embeddable) интерпретер за Схим (Scheme) 

 пројекат такође расподељује и помаже у развоју других пакета који су настали другде, на пример:
* DDD - графичко сучеље () за дебагере
* eCos - мали оперативни систем за уклопне/уграђене () уређаје
* CVS - контрола изворног кода

У јануару 2004. године било је укупно 260  пакета удомљених на -овом сајту  који служу у ту сврху. Остали се могу наћи на другим местима.

Следе званични говорници пројекта

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Кување је уметност, технологија, наука и занат припреманја хране за конзумацију. Технике кухања и састојци увелико варирају у целом свету, од печења хране на отвореном огњу до употребе електричних штедњака, печења у различитим врстама пећница, одражавајући јединствене еколошке, економске и културне традиције и трендове. Врсте кувања такође зависе од нивоа вештине и обучености кувара. Кување обављају обични људи у њиховим домовима, као и професионални кувари у ресторанима и другим прехрамбеним објектима. Кување се може одвијати путем хемијских реакција без присуства топлоте, попут цевича, традиционалног јужноамеричког јела у коме се риба кува са киселинама у лимуновом или лиметином соку.

Припрема хране топлотом или ватром је активност јединствена за људе. Могуће је да је започета пре око 2 милиона година, а археолошки докази постоје за задњих милион година. Ширење пољопривреде, трговине и транспорта између цивилизација у различитим регионима понудило је куварима мноштво нових састојака. Нови изуми и технологије, као што је изум посуђа за држање и кључање воде, проширили су опсег техника кувања. Неки савремени кувари примењују напредне научне технике у припреми хране како би додатно побољшали укус јела које се сервирају.

Кување је термичка обрада сирове хране, за људску исхрану. Кува се у води или на пари - на 100°C. Осим кувања храна се термички може још припремати и печењем или динстањем. Оба начина храну термички обрађују на температури од преко 100°C, с тим што се динстање одвија на нешто нижој температури, ближе 100°C.

Филогенетичка анализа сугерише да су људски преци вероватно измислили кување још пре 1,8 милиона до 2,3 милиона година. Поновна анализа изгорелих фрагмената костију и биљног пепела из пећине Вондерверк у Јужној Африци пружила је доказе који подржавају контролу ватре код раних људи пре 1 милиона година. Постоје докази да је  кувао своју храну још пре 500.000 година. Докази о контролисаној употреби ватре припрадника врсте  који почињу од пре око 400 000 година имају широку научну потпору. Археолошки докази од пре 300.000 година, у облику древних огњишта, земљаних пећи, спаљених животињских костију и кремена, налазе се широм Европе и Блиског истока. Антрополози сматрају да је широко распрострањено кување на ватри започело пре око 250.000 година када су се огњишта први пут појавила.

Недавно је установљено да су најранија огњишта стара најмање 790.000 година.

Комуникација између Старог и Новог света у Колумбијској размени утицала је на историју кувања. Кретање хране преко Атлантика из Новог света, као што су кромпир, парадајз, кукуруз, пасуљ, паприка бабура, чили паприка, ванила, бундева, касава, авокадо, кикирики, пекан, индијски орах, ананас, боровница, сунцокрет, чоколада, тиквице и тикве голице имали су снажан утицај на кување у Старом свету. Кретање хране преко Атлантика из Старог света, попут говеда, оваца, свиња, пшенице, овса, јечма, пиринча, јабука, крушака, грашка, лелебије, бораније, горушице и шаргарепе, слично је променило кување у Новом свету.

У седамнаестом и осамнаестом веку храна је била класични маркер идентитета у Европи. У „доба национализма” деветнаестот века кухиња је постала дефинишући симбол националног идентитета.

Индустријска револуција је донела масовну производњу, масовно стављање у промет и стандардизацију хране. Фабрике које су обрађивале, презервирале, конзервирале и паковале широк избор намирница и прерађених житарица брзо су постале одредница америчког доручка. Током 1920-их појавили су се методи замрзавања, кафетерије и ресторани брзе хране.

Поцетком 20. века владе су издале смернице о исхрани које су довеле до прехрамбене пирамиде (уведене у Шведској 1974). „Храна за малу децу” из 1916. године постала је први УСДА водич који је дао посебне смернице о исхрани. Ажурирани 1920-их, ови водичи дали су сугестије за куповину за породице различитих величина заједно са ревизијом ере депресије, која је обухватала четири нивоа трошкова. Године 1943, УСДА је креирала „Основних седам” графикона за промоцију исхране. Они су садржали прве препоручене дневне количине по подацима Националне академије наука. Године 1956, публикација „Основе адекватне исхране” је навела препоруке у којима је смањен број група о којима ће америчка школска деца учити на четири. Године 1979, водич под називом „Храна” бавио се везом између превеликих количина нездраве хране и хроничних болести. Масти, уља и слаткиши додати су у четири основне групе хране.

Већина састојака у кувању потиче од живих организама. Поврће, воће, житарице и орашасти плодови, као и биље и зачини потичу од биљака, док месо, јаја и млечни производи потичу од животиња. Печурке и квасац који се користе у печењу су врсте гљива. Кувари такође користе воду и минерале као што је со. Кувари такође могу користити вино или жестока пића.

Природни састојци садрже различите количине молекула који се називају протеини, угљени хидрати и масти. Такође садрже воду и минерале. Кување укључује манипулацију хемијским својствима ових молекула.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

Угљени хидрати укључују уобичајени шећер, сахарозу (стони шећер), дисахарид и такве једноставне шећере као што су глукоза (направљена ензимским цепањем сахарозе) и фруктоза (из воћа), и скроб из извора као што су брашно од житарица, пиринач, шипак и кромпир.

Интеракција топлоте и угљених хидрата је сложена. Шећери дугог ланца, као што је скроб, имају тенденцију да се разграде на лакше сварљиве, једноставније шећере. Ако се шећери загреју тако да се избаци сва кристализациона вода, почиње карамелизација, при чему се шећер подвргава термичкој разградњи са стварањем угљеника, а други производи разлагања производе карамелu. Слично, загревање шећера и протеина изазива Малардову реакцију, основну технику за побољшање укуса.

Емулзија скроба са масти или водом може, када се лагано загреје, да обезбеди згушњавање јела које се кува. У европском кулинарству, мешавина путера и брашна која се зове запршка се користи за згушњавање течности за прављење варива или сосова. У азијском кувању, сличан ефекат се добија од мешавине пиринчаног или кукурузног скроба и воде. Ове технике се ослањају на својства скроба за стварање једноставнијих слузавих сахарида током кувања, што узрокује познато згушњавање сосова. Ово згушњавање ће се, међутим, разбити под додатном топлотом.

Врсте масти укључују биљна уља, животињске производе као што су путер и лој, као и масти из житарица, укључујући кукурузно и ланено уље. Масти се користе на више начина у кувању и печењу. За припрему помфрита, сира на жару или палачинки, тигањ или решетка се често премазују машћу или уљем. Масти се такође користе као састојак у пекарским производима као што су колачићи, колачи и пите. Масти могу достићи температуре веће од тачке кључања воде и често се користе за превођење високе топлоте на друге састојке, као што су пржење, дубоко пржење или сотирање. Масти се користе за додавање укуса храни (нпр. путер или масноћа од сланине), спречавање лепљења хране за тигање и стварање жељене текстуре.

Јестиви животињски материјали, укључујући мишиће, изнутрице, млеко, јаја и беланца, садрже значајне количине протеина. Скоро све биљне материје (посебно махунарке и семена) такође садрже протеине, иако углавном у мањим количинама. Печурке имају висок садржај протеина. Било који од ових може бити извор есенцијалних аминокиселина. Када се протеини загреју, они постају денатурисани (развијени) и мењају текстуру. У многим случајевима то узрокује да структура материјала постане мекша или ломљивија – месо постаје кувано, више крхко и мање флексибилно. У неким случајевима, протеини могу формирати чвршће структуре, као што је коагулација албумена у беланцима јајета. Формирање релативно круте, али флексибилне матрице од беланца представља важну компоненту у печењу колача, а такође је основа многих десерта на бази пуслица.

Витамини и минерали су потребни за нормалан метаболизам; а оно што тело не може само произвести мора доћи из спољашњих извора. Витамини долазе из неколико извора укључујући свеже воће и поврће (витамин Ц), шаргарепе, јетре (витамин А), мекиња житарица, хлеба, јетре (витамини Б), уље рибље (витамин Д) и свеже зелено поврће (витамин К). Многи минерали су такође неопходни у малим количинама, укључујући гвожђе, калцијум, магнезијум, натријум хлорид и сумпор; а у веома малим количинама бакар, цинк и селен. Микронутријенти, минерали и витамини у воћу и поврћу могу бити уништени или елуирани кувањем. Витамин Ц је посебно склон оксидацији током кувања и може бити потпуно уништен дуготрајним кувањем. Биорасположивост неких витамина као што су тиамин, витамин Б6, ниацин, фолна киселина и каротеноиди се повећава кувањем тако што се ослобађају од микроструктуре хране. Бланширање или кухање поврћа на пари је начин да се минимизира губитак витамина и минерала током кувања.

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

"""
wkv7.py — публичный слой WKV-7 ядра (forward / backward / inference)
===================================================================
Единая точка входа к WKV-7 на Metal:

    wkv7(r, w, k, v, a, b, training=True)        → (out, state)
    wkv7_train(r, w, k, v, a, b)                 → out      (обучение, autograd)
    wkv7_infer(r, w, k, v, a, b, state)          → (out, new_state)
    wkv7_train_py(r, w, k, v, a, b)              → out      (Python fallback, отладка)

Все тензоры имеют форму [B, T, H, D], где D == HEAD_SIZE (64).
Обучение использует checkpoint-kernel (один fwd + один bwd вызов на весь T).
"""
import mlx.core as mx

from .wkv7_checkpoint import make_wkv7_checkpoint, make_wkv7_checkpoint_with_state

HEAD_SIZE = 64
CHUNK     = 16

# ─────────────────── Fallback: чистый Python einsum (для отладки) ────────────

def _wkv7_chunk_py(r, w, k, v, a, b, h):
    B, T, H, D = r.shape
    outs = []
    for t in range(T):
        r_t = r[:, t]; w_t = w[:, t]; k_t = k[:, t]
        v_t = v[:, t]; a_t = a[:, t]; b_t = b[:, t]
        sa  = mx.einsum("bhsd,bhd->bhs", h, a_t)
        sab = mx.einsum("bhs,bhd->bhsd", sa, b_t)
        vk  = mx.einsum("bhs,bhd->bhsd", v_t, k_t)
        h   = h * w_t[:, :, None, :] + vk + sab
        y   = mx.einsum("bhsd,bhd->bhs", h, r_t)
        outs.append(y)
    return mx.stack(outs, axis=1), h

def wkv7_train_py_with_state(r, w, k, v, a, b, h_in):
    """Einsum reference with an explicit initial state and returned final state."""
    B, T, H, D = r.shape
    h = h_in
    outs = []
    for start in range(0, T, CHUNK):
        end = min(start + CHUNK, T); cl = end - start
        rc,wc,kc,vc,ac,bc = (x[:,start:end] for x in (r,w,k,v,a,b))
        if cl < CHUNK:
            pad = CHUNK - cl
            def p(x, val=0.0):
                return mx.pad(x,[(0,0),(0,pad),(0,0),(0,0)],constant_values=val)
            rc=p(rc);wc=p(wc,1.0);kc=p(kc);vc=p(vc);ac=p(ac);bc=p(bc)
        out_c, h = _wkv7_chunk_py(rc,wc,kc,vc,ac,bc,h)
        outs.append(out_c[:,:cl])
    return mx.concatenate(outs, axis=1), h


def wkv7_train_py(r, w, k, v, a, b):
    B, _, H, D = r.shape
    out, _ = wkv7_train_py_with_state(
        r, w, k, v, a, b, mx.zeros((B, H, D, D))
    )
    return out

# ─────────────────── Metal training kernels (fwd + bwd) ─────────────────────

_fwd_cache = {}
_bwd_cache = {}

def _get_fwd(H):
    if H in _fwd_cache: return _fwd_cache[H]
    hdr = f"""
constant uint HEAD_SIZE_C = {HEAD_SIZE};
constant uint CHUNK_C     = {CHUNK};
constant uint H_C         = {H};
"""
    body = r"""
    uint dv  = thread_position_in_grid.y;
    uint bhi = thread_position_in_grid.x;
    uint bi  = bhi / H_C; uint hi = bhi % H_C;

    float h_row[HEAD_SIZE_C];
    uint h_base = (bi*H_C+hi)*HEAD_SIZE_C*HEAD_SIZE_C + dv*HEAD_SIZE_C;
    for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) h_row[dk] = h_in[h_base+dk];

    for (uint t=0; t<CHUNK_C; t++) {
        uint base = ((bi*CHUNK_C+t)*H_C+hi)*HEAD_SIZE_C;

        float sa = 0.0f;
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) sa += h_row[dk]*a[base+dk];
        sa_out[base+dv] = sa;

        float v_dv = v[base+dv];
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++)
            h_row[dk] = w[base+dk]*h_row[dk] + v_dv*k[base+dk] + sa*b[base+dk];

        float y = 0.0f;
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) y += h_row[dk]*r[base+dk];
        out[base+dv] = y;
    }
    for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) h_out[h_base+dk] = h_row[dk];
"""
    kern = mx.fast.metal_kernel(
        name=f"wkv7_fwd_{H}",
        input_names=["r","w","k","v","a","b","h_in"],
        output_names=["out","h_out","sa_out"],
        header=hdr, source=body,
    )
    _fwd_cache[H] = kern
    return kern

def _get_bwd(H):
    if H in _bwd_cache: return _bwd_cache[H]
    hdr = f"""
constant uint HEAD_SIZE_C = {HEAD_SIZE};
constant uint CHUNK_C     = {CHUNK};
constant uint H_C         = {H};
"""
    body = r"""
    uint dv  = thread_position_in_threadgroup.x;
    uint bhi = threadgroup_position_in_grid.x;
    uint bi  = bhi / H_C; uint hi = bhi % H_C;

    threadgroup float accum[HEAD_SIZE_C][HEAD_SIZE_C];
    threadgroup float k_sh[HEAD_SIZE_C], v_sh[HEAD_SIZE_C];
    threadgroup float r_sh[HEAD_SIZE_C], w_sh[HEAD_SIZE_C];
    threadgroup float a_sh[HEAD_SIZE_C], b_sh[HEAD_SIZE_C];
    threadgroup float dy_sh[HEAD_SIZE_C], sa_sh[HEAD_SIZE_C];
    threadgroup float dsa_sh[HEAD_SIZE_C];

    float C_row[HEAD_SIZE_C];
    float h_row[HEAD_SIZE_C];

    uint h_base = (bi*H_C+hi)*HEAD_SIZE_C*HEAD_SIZE_C + dv*HEAD_SIZE_C;
    for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) {
        C_row[dk] = d_h_out[h_base+dk];
        h_row[dk] = h_out_fwd[h_base+dk];
    }

    for (int t=(int)CHUNK_C-1; t>=0; t--) {
        uint base = ((bi*CHUNK_C+(uint)t)*H_C+hi)*HEAD_SIZE_C;

        k_sh[dv]=k[base+dv]; v_sh[dv]=v[base+dv];
        r_sh[dv]=r[base+dv]; w_sh[dv]=w[base+dv];
        a_sh[dv]=a[base+dv]; b_sh[dv]=b[base+dv];
        dy_sh[dv]=d_out[base+dv]; sa_sh[dv]=sa_fwd_in[base+dv];
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);

        float dy_dv = dy_sh[dv];
        float sa_dv = sa_sh[dv];
        float v_dv  = v_sh[dv];
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) C_row[dk] += dy_dv*r_sh[dk];

        float dsa_dv=0, dv_val=0;
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) {
            dsa_dv += C_row[dk]*b_sh[dk];
            dv_val  += C_row[dk]*k_sh[dk];
        }
        dv_out[base+dv] = dv_val;
        dsa_sh[dv] = dsa_dv;
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);

        // Фаза dr: accum[dv][dk] = dy[dv]*h_cur[dv,dk]
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) accum[dv][dk] = dy_dv*h_row[dk];
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);
        float dr_val=0; for (uint s=0; s<HEAD_SIZE_C; s++) dr_val+=accum[s][dv];
        dr_out[base+dv] = dr_val;
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);

        // sa_dv и v_dv уже определены выше из shared
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) {
            float hp = (h_row[dk] - v_dv*k_sh[dk] - sa_dv*b_sh[dk]) / w_sh[dk];
            accum[dv][dk] = C_row[dk]*hp;
            h_row[dk] = hp;
        }
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);
        float dw_val=0; for (uint s=0; s<HEAD_SIZE_C; s++) dw_val+=accum[s][dv];
        dw_out[base+dv] = dw_val;
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);

        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) accum[dv][dk] = C_row[dk]*v_dv;
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);
        float dk_val=0; for (uint s=0; s<HEAD_SIZE_C; s++) dk_val+=accum[s][dv];
        dk_out[base+dv] = dk_val;
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);

        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) accum[dv][dk] = dsa_sh[dv]*h_row[dk];
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);
        float da_val=0; for (uint s=0; s<HEAD_SIZE_C; s++) da_val+=accum[s][dv];
        da_out[base+dv] = da_val;
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);

        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) accum[dv][dk] = sa_sh[dv]*C_row[dk];
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);
        float db_val=0; for (uint s=0; s<HEAD_SIZE_C; s++) db_val+=accum[s][dv];
        db_out[base+dv] = db_val;
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);

        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++)
            C_row[dk] = C_row[dk]*w_sh[dk] + dsa_dv*a_sh[dk];

        // The next timestep overwrites the threadgroup arrays above. Wait
        // until every thread has finished reading the current w_sh/a_sh.
        threadgroup_barrier(mem_flags::mem_threadgroup);
    }

    for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) dh_in_out[h_base+dk] = C_row[dk];
"""
    kern = mx.fast.metal_kernel(
        name=f"wkv7_bwd_v2_H{H}",
        input_names=["r","w","k","v","a","b","h_out_fwd","sa_fwd_in","d_out","d_h_out"],
        output_names=["dr_out","dw_out","dk_out","dv_out","da_out","db_out","dh_in_out"],
        header=hdr, source=body,
        atomic_outputs=False,
    )
    _bwd_cache[H] = kern
    return kern

@mx.custom_function
def _wkv7_chunk_metal(r, w, k, v, a, b, h_in):
    B, T, H, D = r.shape
    res = _get_fwd(H)(
        inputs=[x.astype(mx.float32) for x in [r,w,k,v,a,b,h_in]],
        grid=(B*H, D, 1), threadgroup=(1, 1, 1),
        output_shapes=[(B,T,H,D), (B,H,D,D), (B,T,H,D)],
        output_dtypes=[mx.float32]*3,
    )
    return res[0], res[1], res[2]

@_wkv7_chunk_metal.vjp
def _wkv7_chunk_metal_vjp(primals, cotangents, outputs):
    r, w, k, v, a, b, h_in = primals
    d_out, d_h_out, _       = cotangents
    _, h_out_fwd, sa_fwd    = outputs
    mx.eval(h_out_fwd, sa_fwd, d_out, d_h_out)
    B, T, H, D = r.shape
    res = _get_bwd(H)(
        inputs=[x.astype(mx.float32) for x in
                [r,w,k,v,a,b,h_out_fwd,sa_fwd,d_out,d_h_out]],
        grid=(B*H*D, 1, 1), threadgroup=(D, 1, 1),
        output_shapes=[(B,T,H,D)]*6 + [(B,H,D,D)],
        output_dtypes=[mx.float32]*7,
    )
    return res[0], res[1], res[2], res[3], res[4], res[5], res[6]

# Checkpoint kernel: один fwd + один bwd вызов на весь T
# 1.73× быстрее chunked v2, численно точнее (stable reconstruction per chunk)
_ckpt_cache: dict = {}
_ckpt_state_cache: dict = {}


def _pad_to_chunk(r, w, k, v, a, b):
    """Дополняет T до кратного CHUNK так, чтобы добавленные шаги были no-op.

    w=1, k=v=a=b=0  =>  h_next = 1*h + v*kᵀ + sa*bᵀ = h. Состояние на выходе
    не меняется, поэтому h_out после паддинга равен h_out без него.
    """
    T = r.shape[1]
    if T % CHUNK == 0:
        return r, w, k, v, a, b, T
    pad = CHUNK - (T % CHUNK)

    def p(x, val=0.0):
        return mx.pad(x, [(0, 0), (0, pad), (0, 0), (0, 0)], constant_values=val)

    return p(r), p(w, 1.0), p(k), p(v), p(a), p(b), T + pad


def wkv7_train(r, w, k, v, a, b):
    B, T, H, D = r.shape
    r, w, k, v, a, b, T_pad = _pad_to_chunk(r, w, k, v, a, b)

    key = (B, T_pad, H, D)
    if key not in _ckpt_cache:
        _ckpt_cache[key] = make_wkv7_checkpoint(B, T_pad, H, D)

    out = _ckpt_cache[key](r, w, k, v, a, b)
    return out[:, :T]


def wkv7_train_with_state(r, w, k, v, a, b, h_in=None):
    """Как wkv7_train, но с явным начальным состоянием и возвратом конечного.

    h_in: [B, H, D, D] или None (нулевое состояние).
    Возвращает (out [B,T,H,D], h_out [B,H,D,D]).

    Дифференцируемо по h_in тоже — VJP ядра отдаёт dh_in, что и позволяет
    учить поверх состояния (реранкер) или тюнить само состояние.
    """
    B, T, H, D = r.shape
    if h_in is None:
        h_in = mx.zeros((B, H, D, D), dtype=mx.float32)
    r, w, k, v, a, b, T_pad = _pad_to_chunk(r, w, k, v, a, b)

    key = (B, T_pad, H, D)
    if key not in _ckpt_state_cache:
        _ckpt_state_cache[key] = make_wkv7_checkpoint_with_state(B, T_pad, H, D)

    out, h_out = _ckpt_state_cache[key](r, w, k, v, a, b, h_in)
    return out[:, :T], h_out


def wkv7_step(r, w, k, v, a, b, h_in):
    """Один шаг рекуррентности на чистых MLX-операциях (T == 1).

    Ядро-checkpoint требует T кратного CHUNK=16, то есть один токен стоил бы
    16 шагов. Реранкер прогоняет ровно один обучаемый токен на блок, поэтому
    здесь дешевле и точнее развернуть шаг в обычные операции: autograd MLX
    даёт градиенты и по параметрам, и по h_in без отдельного backward-ядра.

    r..b: [B, 1, H, D] (либо [B, H, D]). h_in: [B, H, D, D] (h[s, d]).
    Возвращает (out [B, 1, H, D], h_out [B, H, D, D]).
    """
    squeeze = (r.ndim == 4)
    if squeeze:
        r, w, k, v, a, b = (x[:, 0] for x in (r, w, k, v, a, b))
    h = h_in.astype(mx.float32)
    r, w, k, v, a, b = (x.astype(mx.float32) for x in (r, w, k, v, a, b))
    # sa[s] = sum_d h[s,d] * a[d]
    sa = (h * a[:, :, None, :]).sum(axis=-1)                      # [B,H,D]
    h = (h * w[:, :, None, :]
         + v[:, :, :, None] * k[:, :, None, :]
         + sa[:, :, :, None] * b[:, :, None, :])
    out = (h * r[:, :, None, :]).sum(axis=-1)                     # [B,H,D]
    if squeeze:
        out = out[:, None]
    return out, h

# ─────────────────── Inference: Metal kernel ────────────────────────────────

_infer_cache = {}

def _get_infer_kernel(H: int, T: int = None):
    # T -- число шагов, зашиваемое в кернель константой (кеш по (H, T)).
    # По умолчанию CHUNK -- прежнее поведение. T=1 для single-token decode
    # убирает CHUNKx лишней работы (раньше недостающие шаги паддились
    # no-op'ами и весь чанк считался целиком).
    if T is None: T = CHUNK
    key = (H, T)
    if key in _infer_cache: return _infer_cache[key]
    hdr = f"""
constant uint HEAD_SIZE_C = {HEAD_SIZE};
constant uint CHUNK_C     = {T};
constant uint H_C         = {H};
"""
    body = r"""
    uint dv   = thread_position_in_grid.y;
    uint bhi  = thread_position_in_grid.x;
    uint bi   = bhi / H_C; uint hi = bhi % H_C;

    float h_row[HEAD_SIZE_C];
    uint h_base = (bi*H_C+hi)*HEAD_SIZE_C*HEAD_SIZE_C + dv*HEAD_SIZE_C;
    for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) h_row[dk] = h_in[h_base+dk];

    for (uint t=0; t<CHUNK_C; t++) {
        uint base = ((bi*CHUNK_C+t)*H_C+hi)*HEAD_SIZE_C;
        float sa = 0.0f;
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) sa += h_row[dk]*a[base+dk];
        float v_dv = v[base+dv];
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++)
            h_row[dk] = w[base+dk]*h_row[dk] + v_dv*k[base+dk] + sa*b[base+dk];
        float y = 0.0f;
        for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) y += h_row[dk]*r[base+dk];
        out[((bi*CHUNK_C+t)*H_C+hi)*HEAD_SIZE_C+dv] = y;
    }
    for (uint dk=0; dk<HEAD_SIZE_C; dk++) h_out[h_base+dk] = h_row[dk];
"""
    kern = mx.fast.metal_kernel(
        name=f"wkv7_infer_{H}_{T}",
        input_names=["r","w","k","v","a","b","h_in"],
        output_names=["out","h_out"],
        header=hdr, source=body,
    )
    _infer_cache[key] = kern
    return kern

def wkv7_infer(r, w, k, v, a, b, h):
    B, T, H, D = r.shape
    assert D == HEAD_SIZE, f"HEAD_SIZE mismatch: got {D}, expected {HEAD_SIZE}"
    assert T >= 1, "T must be >= 1"
    inputs = [x.astype(mx.float32) for x in [r,w,k,v,a,b,h]]
    res = _get_infer_kernel(H, T)(
        inputs=inputs,
        grid=(B*H, D, 1), threadgroup=(1, 1, 1),
        output_shapes=[(B,T,H,D), (B,H,D,D)],
        output_dtypes=[mx.float32, mx.float32],
    )
    return res[0], res[1]

# ─────────────────── Публичный API ──────────────────────────────────────────

def wkv7(r, w, k, v, a, b, training=True, state=None, return_state=False):
    """Единая точка входа.

    training=True, state=None, return_state=False  → (out, None), h0 = 0
    training=True, state и/или return_state        → (out, h_out), дифференцируемо по state
    training=False                                  → (out, h_out) на inference-ядре
    """
    if not training:
        return wkv7_infer(r, w, k, v, a, b, state)
    if state is None and not return_state:
        return wkv7_train(r, w, k, v, a, b), None
    return wkv7_train_with_state(r, w, k, v, a, b, state)

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

import SwiftUI

// MARK: - SearchScope
//
// Передаётся при вызове ProjectSearchView — определяет, что именно искать.
// Каждый воркспейс создаёт свой набор:
//
//   BookWorkspace:
//     ProjectSearchView(project: project, scope: .book, ...)
//
//   ScreenplayWorkspace (пример будущего):
//     ProjectSearchView(project: project, scope: .screenplay, ...)

struct SearchScope {
    var allowKeywordTypes: Set<SearchResultType>    // Типы для быстрого поиска по словам
    var allowSemanticChapters: Bool                  // Включать ли глубокий семантический поиск по тексту глав
    var allowSemanticScenes: Bool                    // Включать ли семантический поиск по сценам

    // Готовые пресеты для разных воркспейсов
    static let book = SearchScope(
        allowKeywordTypes: [.chapter, .character, .worldResource,
                            .worldConcept, .worldStructure, .metaphysics],
        allowSemanticChapters: true,
        allowSemanticScenes: false
    )

    static let screenplay = SearchScope(
        allowKeywordTypes: [.scene, .screenRole],
        allowSemanticChapters: false,
        allowSemanticScenes: true
    )

    static let novel = SearchScope(
        allowKeywordTypes: [.chapter, .character],
        allowSemanticChapters: true,
        allowSemanticScenes: false
    )
}

// MARK: - ProjectSearchView

struct ProjectSearchView: View {
    let project: WritingProject
    let scope: SearchScope
    var onChapterSelect: (Chapter) -> Void = { _ in }
    var onCharacterSelect: (Character) -> Void = { _ in }
    var onSceneSelect: (ScreenScene) -> Void = { _ in }
    var onScreenRoleSelect: (ScreenRole) -> Void = { _ in }

    @ObservedObject private var service = EmbeddingService.shared

    // Keyword search
    @State private var query = ""
    @State private var keywordResults: [SearchResult] = []
    @State private var keywordTask: Task<Void, Never>? = nil

    // Semantic search
    @State private var semanticResults: [SearchResult] = []
    @State private var semanticTask: Task<Void, Never>? = nil
    @State private var isSemanticRunning = false
    @State private var semanticProgress: Int = 0
    @State private var semanticTotal: Int = 0

    // UI state
    @State private var showEmpty = false
    @State private var emptyDelayTask: Task<Void, Never>? = nil
    @FocusState private var isSearchFocused: Bool

    var body: some View {
        VStack(spacing: 0) {
            searchFieldView
                .padding(.horizontal, 16)
                .padding(.vertical, 10)

            Divider()

            if showEmpty && semanticResults.isEmpty && !isSemanticRunning {
                ContentUnavailableView(
                    "Ничего не найдено",
                    systemImage: "doc.text.magnifyingglass",
                    description: Text("Попробуйте другую формулировку")
                )
            } else {
                ConstellationView(
                    query: query,
                    nodes: constellationNodes,
                    processingProgress: semanticTotal > 0
                        ? Float(semanticProgress) / Float(semanticTotal)
                        : 1.0,
                    isProcessing: isSemanticRunning,
                    onSelect: { node in
                        if let result = semanticResults.first(where: { $0.id == node.id }) {
                            handleSelect(result)
                        }
                    }
                )
            }
        }
        .background(Color("PrimaryAccent"))
    }

    // ── TextField — единственный экземпляр во всём view ────────────────
    private var searchFieldView: some View {
        HStack(spacing: 10) {
            Image(systemName: "magnifyingglass")
                .foregroundStyle(isSearchFocused ? Color("AccentColor") : Color("SecondaryText"))
                .font(.system(size: 15))
                .animation(.easeInOut(duration: 0.15), value: isSearchFocused)

            TextField("Поиск по проекту...", text: $query)
                .textFieldStyle(.plain)
                .font(.system(size: 14))
                .focused($isSearchFocused)
                .onSubmit { runSearch() }
                .onChange(of: query) { _, new in scheduleSearch(new) }

            if isSemanticRunning {
                ProgressView()
                    .controlSize(.small)
                    .help("Семантический поиск: \(semanticProgress)/\(semanticTotal) глав")
            } else if !query.isEmpty {
                Button { clearSearch() } label: {
                    Image(systemName: "xmark.circle.fill")
                        .foregroundStyle(Color("SecondaryText").opacity(0.6))
                }
                .buttonStyle(.plain)
            }
        }
        .padding(10)
        .background(Color("Editor"), in: RoundedRectangle(cornerRadius: 10))
        .overlay(
            RoundedRectangle(cornerRadius: 10)
                .stroke(Color("AccentColor").opacity(isSearchFocused ? 0.3 : 0), lineWidth: 1)
                .animation(.easeInOut(duration: 0.15), value: isSearchFocused)
        )
    }

    // MARK: - Constellation Data

    private var constellationNodes: [ConstellationNode] {
        semanticResults.map { r in
            ConstellationNode(id: r.id, chapter: r.title, score: r.score,
                              snippet: r.snippet, type: r.type)
        }
    }

    // MARK: - Logic

    private func scheduleSearch(_ text: String) {
        keywordTask?.cancel()
        semanticTask?.cancel()
        emptyDelayTask?.cancel()
        showEmpty = false

        let trimmed = text.trimmingCharacters(in: .whitespaces)
        guard !trimmed.isEmpty else {
            clearSearch()
            return
        }

        // Keyword — дебаунс 150ms (только для showEmpty-детекции)
        keywordTask = Task {
            try? await Task.sleep(for: .milliseconds(150))
            guard !Task.isCancelled else { return }
            let found = service.keywordSearch(query: trimmed, in: project)
                .filter { scope.allowKeywordTypes.contains($0.type) }
            await MainActor.run { keywordResults = found }
        }

        // Semantic — после 400ms паузы
        if scope.allowSemanticChapters || scope.allowSemanticScenes {
            semanticTask = Task {
                try? await Task.sleep(for: .milliseconds(400))
                guard !Task.isCancelled else { return }
                await runSemanticSearch(query: trimmed)
            }
        }

        // "Ничего не найдено" — только через 2 секунды
        emptyDelayTask = Task {
            try? await Task.sleep(for: .seconds(2))
            guard !Task.isCancelled else { return }
            await MainActor.run {
                withAnimation(.easeInOut(duration: 0.3)) {
                    showEmpty = true
                }
            }
        }
    }

    private func runSearch() {
        let trimmed = query.trimmingCharacters(in: .whitespaces)
        guard !trimmed.isEmpty else { return }
        scheduleSearch(trimmed)
    }

    private func runSemanticSearch(query: String) async {
        if scope.allowSemanticScenes {
            let scenes = project.scenes ?? []
            guard !scenes.isEmpty else { return }

            await MainActor.run {
                semanticResults = []
                isSemanticRunning = true
                semanticProgress = 0
                semanticTotal = scenes.count
            }

            await service.semanticSceneSearch(
                query: query,
                scenes: scenes
            ) { result in
                var updated = semanticResults
                updated.append(result)
                updated.sort { $0.score > $1.score }
                semanticResults = updated
                semanticProgress += 1
            }
        } else if scope.allowSemanticChapters {
            let chapters = project.chapters ?? []
            guard !chapters.isEmpty else { return }

            await MainActor.run {
                semanticResults = []
                isSemanticRunning = true
                semanticProgress = 0
                semanticTotal = chapters.count
            }

            await service.semanticChapterSearch(
                query: query,
                chapters: chapters
            ) { result in
                var updated = semanticResults
                updated.append(result)
                updated.sort { $0.score > $1.score }
                semanticResults = updated
                semanticProgress += 1
            }
        }

        await MainActor.run {
            isSemanticRunning = false
        }
    }

    private func clearSearch() {
        keywordTask?.cancel()
        semanticTask?.cancel()
        emptyDelayTask?.cancel()
        query = ""
        keywordResults = []
        semanticResults = []
        isSemanticRunning = false
        showEmpty = false
    }

    private func handleSelect(_ result: SearchResult) {
        if let chapter    = result.chapter    { onChapterSelect(chapter) }
        if let character  = result.character  { onCharacterSelect(character) }
        if let scene      = result.scene      { onSceneSelect(scene) }
        if let screenRole = result.screenRole { onScreenRoleSelect(screenRole) }
    }
}

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

import Foundation

// ── Источник истины каталога: коллекция HF ImpulseLeap/neuromodels ──
// Элемент коллекции = репозиторий модели. Метадата модели — её config.json в репо.
enum HF {
    static let collectionSlug = "ImpulseLeap/neuromodels"   // короткий slug работает (API отдаёт 200)
    static let datasetsSlug  = "ImpulseLeap/neurodatasets"
    static func collection(_ slug: String) -> URL { URL(string: "https://huggingface.co/api/collections/\(slug)")! }
    static var collectionAPI: URL { URL(string: "https://huggingface.co/api/collections/\(collectionSlug)")! }
    // resolve/main/<path>; для LFS отдаёт 302 на CDN — URLSession проходит редирект сам
    static func resolve(_ repoId: String, _ path: String, dataset: Bool = false) -> URL {
        let base = dataset ? "https://huggingface.co/datasets/" : "https://huggingface.co/"
        return URL(string: base + repoId + "/resolve/main/" + path)!
    }
}

// Один пункт каталога: репо + распарсенный config.json. id = model_name (или basename репо).
struct CatalogModel: Identifiable, Codable {
    let id: String
    let repoId: String
    let config: ModelConfig
    var configURL: URL    { HF.resolve(repoId, "config.json") }
    var weightsURL: URL   { HF.resolve(repoId, config.weights) }
    var tokenizerURL: URL { HF.resolve(repoId, config.tokenizerPath) }
}

enum RemoteCatalog {
    private struct Collection: Decodable { let items: [Item] }
    private struct Item: Decodable { let id: String; let type: String; let position: Int? }

    // Читает коллекцию и для каждого model-элемента подтягивает config.json.
    // Битый/недоступный репо пропускается, а не валит весь каталог.
    static func fetch() async throws -> [CatalogModel] {
        let (data, resp) = try await URLSession.shared.data(from: HF.collectionAPI)
        guard (resp as? HTTPURLResponse)?.statusCode == 200 else { throw URLError(.badServerResponse) }
        let col = try JSONDecoder().decode(Collection.self, from: data)
        var out: [CatalogModel] = []
        for it in col.items.sorted(by: { ($0.position ?? 0) < ($1.position ?? 0) }) where it.type == "model" {
            do {
                let (cdata, cresp) = try await URLSession.shared.data(from: HF.resolve(it.id, "config.json"))
                guard (cresp as? HTTPURLResponse)?.statusCode == 200 else { continue }
                let cfg = try JSONDecoder().decode(ModelConfig.self, from: cdata)
                let mid = cfg.modelName ?? String(it.id.split(separator: "/").last ?? Substring(it.id))
                out.append(CatalogModel(id: mid, repoId: it.id, config: cfg))
            } catch { continue }
        }
        return out
    }
}


// ── Датасет: config.json (schema_version, dataset_name, language, task, labels[], num_examples, description) ──
struct DatasetConfig: Codable {
    var datasetName: String
    var language: String
    var task: String
    var labels: [String]
    var trainExamples: Int
    var valExamples: Int
    var description: String?
    var ctxLen: Int?

    private enum K: String, CodingKey {
        case datasetName = "dataset_name", language, task, labels, description
        case numExamples = "num_examples", ctxLen = "ctx_len"
    }
    private struct Counts: Codable { var train: Int?; var val: Int? }

    init(from d: Decoder) throws {
        let c = try d.container(keyedBy: K.self)
        datasetName = (try? c.decode(String.self, forKey: .datasetName)) ?? "dataset"
        language    = (try? c.decode(String.self, forKey: .language)) ?? "ru"
        task        = (try? c.decode(String.self, forKey: .task)) ?? "text_classification"
        labels      = (try? c.decode([String].self, forKey: .labels)) ?? []
        description = try? c.decode(String.self, forKey: .description)
        let counts  = try? c.decode(Counts.self, forKey: .numExamples)
        trainExamples = counts?.train ?? 0
        valExamples   = counts?.val ?? 0
        ctxLen      = try? c.decode(Int.self, forKey: .ctxLen)
    }
    func encode(to e: Encoder) throws {
        var c = e.container(keyedBy: K.self)
        try c.encode(datasetName, forKey: .datasetName)
        try c.encode(language, forKey: .language)
        try c.encode(task, forKey: .task)
        try c.encode(labels, forKey: .labels)
        try c.encodeIfPresent(description, forKey: .description)
        try c.encode(["train": trainExamples, "val": valExamples], forKey: .numExamples)
        try c.encodeIfPresent(ctxLen, forKey: .ctxLen)
    }
}

struct CatalogDataset: Identifiable, Codable {
    let id: String          // dataset_name
    let repoId: String      // "ImpulseLeap/ru-headline-classification"
    let config: DatasetConfig
    var configURL: URL { HF.resolve(repoId, "config.json", dataset: true) }
    var trainURL: URL  { HF.resolve(repoId, "train.jsonl", dataset: true) }
    var valURL: URL    { HF.resolve(repoId, "val.jsonl", dataset: true) }
}

extension RemoteCatalog {
    private struct Coll: Decodable { let items: [It] }
    private struct It: Decodable { let id: String; let type: String; let position: Int? }

    static func fetchDatasets() async throws -> [CatalogDataset] {
        let (data, resp) = try await URLSession.shared.data(from: HF.collection(HF.datasetsSlug))
        guard (resp as? HTTPURLResponse)?.statusCode == 200 else { throw URLError(.badServerResponse) }
        let col = try JSONDecoder().decode(Coll.self, from: data)
        var out: [CatalogDataset] = []
        for it in col.items.sorted(by: { ($0.position ?? 0) < ($1.position ?? 0) }) where it.type == "dataset" {
            do {
                let url = HF.resolve(it.id, "config.json", dataset: true)
                let (cdata, cresp) = try await URLSession.shared.data(from: url)
                guard (cresp as? HTTPURLResponse)?.statusCode == 200 else { continue }
                let cfg = try JSONDecoder().decode(DatasetConfig.self, from: cdata)
                let did = cfg.datasetName.isEmpty ? String(it.id.split(separator: "/").last ?? Substring(it.id)) : cfg.datasetName
                out.append(CatalogDataset(id: did, repoId: it.id, config: cfg))
            } catch { continue }
        }
        return out
    }
}

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

“殿下说得对！下令将士们不要浪费手里的手雷，没有我的命令不准随便扔！”曹行又吩咐道。
吩咐完了这句话，他转过头看向不远处萨尔哈部集合的位置，笑道：“我看萨尔哈怎么驱使这些辅兵！”
“多半是用逼迫的法子。他绝不会现在就用主力冲阵的！”宋瑄笑道。
“那就看看他怎么逼迫了！”
“你们马上再次冲锋！”萨尔哈看着面前的士兵，大声吩咐道。
“将军，明军的手雷太可怕了，尤其是他们藏在烟雾后面，在我们冲进烟雾里面前根本看不清他们是不是打算用手雷，等冲进去后就算看到他们打算用手雷也已经晚了。”有人说道。
“放心，明军不会有多少手雷的。”萨尔哈不得不耐心的劝说：“明军本来就是火器部队，士兵需要携带弹丸和火药，不可能同时再带着许多手雷上战场。”
“现在我军已经将这不到两万明军包围了，只要消灭了他们，就能沉重打击明军，甚至趁机击败明军，获得战争的胜利，所以必须继续攻击面前的敌人。而且，只要击败了明军，大汗绝不会吝惜赏赐，你们也能够得到许多奴隶。”
他见这些辅兵还有些犹豫，又道：“另外，你们忘了死在明军手里的真主的信徒了么？如果帖木儿大汗战败撤退，明军即使不会追到撒马尔罕也至少会追到阿拉山口，所有人一旦被明军俘虏，很可能会被杀掉！即使不被杀也会一辈子当奴隶，干最苦最累的活儿一直到死，没有女人也不会有孩子！你们愿意过这样的日子吗？”
与宋瑄和曹行预料的不同得是，萨尔哈根本不会采用逼迫的方法来让辅兵上阵。虽然帖木儿对这些人的定义是炮灰，但他很少表现出他们就是炮灰的意思来，尤其是这次东征明国，而明国是一个确定无疑的异教徒国家，他征调的辅兵都是信奉天方教的人，也一直在用天方教团结他们，让他们愿意打仗，而不是被迫打仗。萨尔哈当然也效仿帖木儿，采用种种方式劝诱他们。
听到萨尔哈的话，这些人都被打动了。明国对于天方教徒的迫害是公开的，他们早就听说过，这次东征后也见到过，知道萨尔哈的话是对的。所以为了自己，也就只能拼命作战了。
“真主至大！”他们重新鼓舞起士气，再次对曹行部发动冲锋。
曹行对此十分不解，不过现在也不是思考这个的时候，他见西虏嚎叫着发动冲锋，下令将士装填好弹药，准备好手雷，长枪和马刀也放在合适的位置，随时准备与西虏搏杀。
在萨尔哈的鼓动下，西虏以极高的士气发动进攻。当然，他们暂时对于上次在烟雾内被手雷炸死还心有余悸，不敢贸然冲进去，每次只是靠近烟雾放箭后就撤回来，之后再次发动冲锋。
同时帖木儿也下令炮队对曹行部发动炮击。面对无可阻挡的大炮，曹行也没什么办法，只能下令躲闪；萨尔哈就趁机指挥骑兵在明军躲闪的时候发动冲锋，即使有人被自家的炮弹所打死也丝毫不顾。
曹行不得不又下令将士不能闪躲，坚守阵地。战争又变得惨烈起来。
“大哥，大哥你怎么了！”一名将士怀里抱着一个身穿六品官服的男子，哭道。
“大哥不行了，你快把大哥放下，准备御敌！”被他抱在怀里的人艰难的张嘴说道。
“可是，”他当然知道大哥说的是对的，可这是他大哥啊，他现在放手了，就再也见不到了。
“老三，你快放下大哥，准备对付西虏。”这个时候，从他身旁忽然传来声音道。
“二哥，我……”他话还没有说完，就被二哥打断了：“磨蹭什么！”不仅如此，他二哥还一把从他怀里将大哥抢过来，小心翼翼的放到一块还算平整的地面上，然后将老三的火铳塞进他手里，拉着他面对正要冲过来的西虏。
这个过程中老三基本上是麻木的，一直到传来“开火”的命令，他才反应过来，将手里火铳的三发弹丸都发射出去，同时大叫道：“你们这些该死的西虏，我要杀光你们！”
在百户战死后指挥他们的试百户见此皱了皱眉。按照战术规定不能一次将三发弹丸都发射出去，但想到刚刚被西虏的弓箭射死的他大哥刘发，也就没说什么。
名叫刘舒的老三怀着一腔怒火重新装填弹药，并且在西虏又冲过来后再次将三发弹丸全部发射出去。
但这一次他的做法是对的。随着西虏的大炮轰击，从他们阵势向外近百步都是大炮的轰击范围，有些大炮发射出来的炮弹也不知掺杂了什么还带着烟，使得他们即使不开火也看不清西虏骑兵的动向，只能依靠从地面传来的震动判断。
但这次萨尔哈采用了十分卑鄙的做法。他在自家的大炮刚刚轰击完毕、烟雾尚未散去的时候让骑兵都下马牵着马向前走，一直冲到距离明军阵势不足五十步时才上马冲锋。
一般的明军将士发射完一轮弹丸还等着发射第二轮的机会，就发现西虏已经冲到面前，顿时略有些惊慌。好在他们都久经训练大多也上过战场，惊慌只维持了一瞬就回过神来，匆匆将手里的三眼火铳中的弹丸发射出去，随即抡起了手里的火铳就夯向冲过来的西虏。
西虏手里的长枪也刺过来。在大多数地方因为围挡的缘故骑兵冲不进去，只能用弓箭和长枪与明军搏杀，要消灭了守在围挡附近的明军再翻越过去。明军当然不能让他们如愿，死命反击。
这还算容易。可有些地方已经被西虏的大炮轰开了缺口，即使缺口不大也不是那么容易阻拦的。明军只能一边拼命阻拦西虏的骑兵，一边找东西堵住缺口。
数十名西虏骑兵大声唿喊着口号向一处缺口冲了过来，同时不停的向缺口处放箭。
“快，你们十个人举起长枪当做长矛阵，拦住西虏；你们十个人赶快去找能堵住缺口的东西，剩下的人做好准备，随时与西虏搏杀。”总旗刘交大声吩咐道。
被指派拦住西虏的人怀着一股悲壮之气上前。十个人在小旗的指挥下分成两排形成密集队形正好将缺口完全堵住，举起长枪结成阵势阻拦西虏。
见此情形，带队冲锋的西虏下令蒙住马匹的眼睛，继续冲锋，即使牺牲掉手下的所有马匹也在所不惜。
很快，这些马匹因为看不清前方不躲不闪的冲锋冲到了长枪阵上，在长枪刺入身体的一瞬知道被后背的骑手蒙骗了，但此时也已经无法拐弯，只能在惯性的作用下一边悲鸣着一边继续向前冲锋，使得长枪完全刺入体内，随后倒在地上。
失去了手中长枪的明军将士马上向后退去躲在原来的第二排长枪后，将原本挂在后背的火铳拿下来对准前方开火。
但西虏仍然不管不顾的冲上来，使得堵上缺口变得异常艰难。
曹行看着正奋力与西虏搏杀的将士牙齿都快咬碎了，不停的看向中军大营的方向，看着正与阻拦援兵的耶斯布和铁勒台部激烈交战的蓝珍等人手下的将士不停的说道：“怎么还不能冲破西虏！怎么还不能冲破西虏！”
“曹行！”济烨不得不说道：“这才不到半个时辰，他们已经取得了进展，再有半个时辰就能冲过来了！不要这么着急n况你着急也无用。”
“哎！”曹行只是叹了口气，没有说话。济烨只不过是这几天才在他们军中，没有他对府军左右卫的感情。每死一个人他都心疼的不得了，济烨怎么能理解呢。
曹行叹过气后继续看着面前正抵抗西虏的手下将士，见到哪里比较危险就下令其他地方的将士赶过去支援，同时偶尔看一眼援兵前来的方向。
忽然他听宋瑄说道：“曹行，徐将军又派来了一支骑兵冲阵。”
“骑兵也不好使！”曹行随意的向后看看，同时说道。
可就在此时，那只新冲过来的骑兵面前的西虏竟然溃退了，让整个西虏的阻敌阵线中间出现了一个巨大的缺口。曹行几乎能看出就连带领这支骑兵的将领都很疑惑，但转瞬间就回过神来，带领部下从缺口充了进来，破了西虏的阵线。
见到自家的阵线被击破，两侧的西虏一开始还想封堵缺口，但源源不断冲过来的明军护住了这个宝贵的缺口。见此情形，西虏彻底崩溃了，向后逃去。
“真是太好了！”见此情形，曹行高兴的大叫道。
但他随既又有些疑惑：“这是怎么回事？为什么面对后赶来的这支骑兵当面的西虏会溃退？”
不过这个问题没人能够回答，他也反应过来，又问道：“这支骑兵是哪个卫所？”
“看旗帜，是永明左卫和朝鲜军。”
“为什么会是他们？”

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

女：很高兴和大家在这里见面，我是主持人，冯麟茜。
经过数天以来的紧张筹备。今天，我们四个协会终于迎来了这次，主题为“知法律，我演讲”的演讲比赛决赛!
男：本次团活动凝聚了四个支部的力量，经过了数日的精心筹备，今晚，要为大家带来一个学习型的法律演讲比赛，展现我们当代大学生“懂法知法，学法爱法”的积极态度!
男：在比赛开始之前，我很荣幸的向大家介绍出席本次比赛的评委，嘉宾。首先在这里要为你们介绍的是我们的嘉宾，她们是。。。。。。(欢迎您!)
男：还有，出席本次团活动的评委有。。。。。。。。。欢迎你们的到来。
男：在比赛开始之前，我想先给大家讲一个小故事。
1882年帕尔默在纽约用毒药杀死了自己的祖父，他的祖父在现有的遗嘱中给他留下了一大笔遗产。帕尔默因*的罪行被法庭判处监禁几年，但帕尔默是否能享有继承其祖父遗产的权利成了一个让法官头疼的疑难案件。如果法院剥夺帕尔默的继承权，那么法院就是在更改法律，就是用自己的道德信仰来取代法律。
女：现场在座的各位同学，你们认为帕尔默是否有继承其祖父遗产的权利?
法官最后援引了一条古老的法律原则——任何人不能从其自身的过错中受益，所以，纽约州法院判决剥夺帕尔默的继承权。
女：我们从中可以看出：“理解法律的真实含义不能仅以处于历史孤立状态中的法律文本为依据，法官应当创造性的构思出一种与普遍渗透于法律之中的正义原则最为接近的法律，从而维护整个法律体系的统一性”。
大家晚上好!
在花香四溢的美丽五月中，我们迎来了食品学院第一届“普法校园你我共创”演讲比赛的举行。自从我国确立依法治国的方针以来，国家法律体系不断完善，法律制度不断健全。而依法治校是依法治国方略对高校管理的必然要求，也是建立现代大学制度的必由之路。为了更好的在高校开展普法工作，今天我们在这里举办“普法校园你我共创”演讲比赛。下面请允许我介绍现场的评委他们是：
让我们再一次以热烈的掌声欢迎他们的到来!
感谢精彩讲话。从精彩讲话中我们再次体会到了校园普法的重要意义。下面我简要介绍本比赛的评分规则。
接下来就是我们选手的时间了。
1.法律社会我们更是离不开法律，就像信息时代，我们离不开计算机一样。大学生学习法律、懂得法律，遵守法律，维*律对建设社会主义法律社会具有重要的意义。下面是本次演讲比赛首先上场的计算机系多媒体091班的孙正伟，他给我们带来的演讲是《守法、懂法》
3.美丽的青春谁都想长久的拥有，但是青春路上难免有些荆棘，为了使我们如夏花般绚烂的青春不是去美丽请欣赏经济贸易系国贸092班的王灵灵同学给大家带来的《莫让青春失去美丽》
4.新时期以来，随着我国法律体系的不断完善，建设社会主义法制国家进程的推进，法律在大学生心中的地位也不短的提升，大学生的法律意识不断增强。下面有请会计学系会审091班的鹿奇同学给大家带来演讲《法在我心中》。
5.普及法律知识，让全社会形成一种尊重法律，维*律的良好风气，对构建社会主义和谐社会具有重要的意义。同样和谐校园的创建也离不开法律知识在大学生当中的普及。请欣赏由外语系文秘091班杨洁同学为大家带来的演讲《普及法律知识、共创和谐校园》
6.有法可依、有法必依、违法必究、执法必严。是我国法律建设的原则，也体现了我国法律的*。尊重法律在公民生活和社会主义建设中的地位更是对我们大学生的的要求，这样既有利于维*律的*也有利于建设我们的和谐校园。下面有请食品工程系食生094班的孔庆同学为大家带来《创法律*、建和谐校园》掌声欢迎!
7.公民的法律意识是衡量一个国家是否实行了法治一个重要标志。要培养整个社会的法治意识，必须从每个个体的意识入手。因此让每个公民心中树立法律意识显得尤为重要。下面，请欣赏机电工程系电子091的吴亚云为我们带来《普法在我心》
8.有了目标，我们有了信念，我们不再彷徨，有了法律，有了规矩，我们不再迷茫!学习知识是为了服务人民，建设社会主义。然而如果我们知识运用的不当。不但不能体现自己的社会价值，甚至会成为人民的危害。为了我们的大学不再迷茫请欣赏由旅游烹饪系旅游091班的卞文娇给大家带来演讲《大学，我们不再迷茫》
感谢各位选手的精彩演讲，现在我们今天比赛的各个奖项也产生过了。下面我公布本次比赛的获奖名单。
然我们以热烈的掌声献给他们。
现在我宣布首届“普法校园你我共创”演讲比赛的举行到此结束。
甲：今天虽然寒风凛冽，但我们心中暖流涌动，
乙：因为，我们欢聚一堂，
甲：因为，我们同舟共济，
乙：因为，我们知法守法，
甲：因为我们学法用法。
乙：随着一阵阵锣鼓声的敲响，丙贡小学20xx年“法制在我身边”演讲比赛拉开了序幕。
甲：下面我们以热烈的掌声有请韦洪金校长为本次比赛致辞。
一、演讲内容(3分)：紧扣“法律”主题，观点鲜明，逻辑严谨，言之有理，言之有物。
二、演讲仪态(2分)：衣着整洁，仪态大方，举止从容，手势运用自然得体。
三、演讲技巧(2分)：普通话演讲，语言生动，抑扬顿挫，情感处理得当。
乙：现在我宣布丙贡小学以“法制”为主题的演讲比赛现在正式开始。
甲：首先让我们用掌声预祝今天的参赛选手取得优异的成绩，……，有请1号选手，来自丙贡小学二年级(2)班的范蓉蓉，她演讲的题目是《法制安全在我身边》。
乙：同学们：法制安全，对于每一个人都是最基本的需要。由于各种案件发生的不可预测性，突发事件不可避免。我们必须加强认识、时刻提醒，做到警钟长鸣。接下来上场的2号选手是来自丙贡小学五年级的杨超，他演讲的题目是《法律就在我身边》。
甲：现在我公布一下1号选手的得分情况……下面上场的是来自青梨小学四年级的韦小雨，他演讲的题目是《在学习中学习法律知识》。
甲：现在我公布一下2号选手的得分情况……让我们掌声有请丙贡小学张继和张文彬为我们带来《法律在我心中》。
乙：是啊!人的一生离不开法律，人生路上我们与法律通行，请欣赏青梨小学的吴小虎同学带来的《成长路上与法同行》。
甲：现在我公布一下3号选手的得分情况……掌声有请韦雨雨同学上台演讲，她的演讲题目是《社会生活离不开法律》。
乙：接下来上场的时来自大地头小学的韦金同学，他演讲的题目是《法律伴我成长》，掌声有请。
甲：如果把没有钱打官司的困难群众比作久旱的土地的话，法律援助就是他们的及时雨。下面有请杨光阳小朋友为我们演讲《我们与法律援助同在》。
乙：现在我公布一下4号选手的得分情况……每个人心中的“法”是怎样的就不太重要了，我们要将“法”根植于我们的内心，成为一个理性的守法公民。请听《法在我心中》，演讲者陈飞。
甲：现在我公布一下5号选手的得分情况……下面有请来自青梨小学的王金锁同学为我们演讲《学习法律知识、做合格少年》。
乙：现在我公布一下6号选手的得分情况……可能有人会说，法离我们很远，下面梁小景告诉我们《法律在我身边》。
甲：现在我公布一下7号选手的得分情况……下面请欣赏大地头小学的王小丹同学为我们演讲《法律伴我成长》。
乙：现在我公布一下8号选手的得分情况……掌声有请韦灵波同学为我们演讲《法律在我心中》。
甲：现在我公布一下9号选手的得分情况……作为祖国未来的我们，应该知荣辱，树新风，做遵纪守法的小学生。请听王飘飘小朋友的演讲《做遵纪守法的小学生》。
乙：现在我公布一下10号选手的得分情况……下面有请来自丙贡小学的张水仙同学为我们演讲《法律在我心中》。
甲：现在我公布一下11号选手的得分情况……下面有请来自丙贡小学的梁超同学为我们演讲《法律在我身边》。
乙：现在我公布一下12号选手的得分情况……下面有请来自大地头小学的班鑫同学为我们演讲《做遵纪守法的好学生》。
甲：现在我公布一下13号选手的得分情况……接下来上场的时来自青梨小学的吴小碗同学，他演讲的题目是《法律伴我成长》，掌声有请。
乙：现在我公布一下14号选手的得分情况……今天我们学了许多法律知识，那么，遇到歹徒怎么办呢?请王丰丰同学为我们细细道来。
甲：下面我公布一下最后几位选手的得分情况
乙：经过几位评委老师公平、公正的评判，最后评出本次比赛的前三名。
合：同学们，法制的社会是和谐的，是美好的，让我们携起手来，共同学法、知法、守法、用法，共同描绘灿烂的明天;让我们心中时刻铭记，铭记法的威严与壮义。本次比赛到此结束，谢谢大家。

——————————————— CHUNK ———————————————

【精彩预告】民族交响诗《大运河》音乐会，奏响古朴运河风情!
民族音乐是中华传统文化的瑰宝，音乐是无国界的人类共同语言，以大运河历史发展、功能及沿线丰富的文化资源为创作蓝本，用民族音乐语言来讲述运河故事是对大运河最好的宣传方式之一，是展现运河文化气质、挖掘运河文化精髓的重要表达方式之一，同时也是展现民族精神、传播当代中国价值观念，创作具有中国特色、中国风格和中国气派的民族音乐作品的有益尝试。 民族交响诗《大运河》通过大气磅礴、质朴深情的音乐旋律来描绘运河与家国命运、商贸民生、城市发展、水利交通、文化艺术的紧密关联，彰显运河文化的丰厚与璀璨。演出信息毕业于中央音乐学院作曲系。中国音乐家协会会员，作曲与作曲理论学会理事。国防大学军事文化学院（原解放军艺术学院）作曲专业青年教师。接受国内外各类重要机构、乐团和著名音乐节的大量委约创作。作品荣获“美国巴洛基金国际作曲比赛”冠军大奖，并在“国家文化和旅游部全国交响乐作品比赛”、“中国音乐家协会中国当代歌曲创作精品工程——特别贡献原创作品”、“帕拉天奴”等中斩获重要奖项。多部作品入选：中华人民共和国文化和旅游部“时代交响计划”、庆祝改革开放40周年中国交响乐作品回顾展、庆祝中华人民共和国成立70周年中国交响乐作品展演等，并多次获得“国家艺术基金”和“中国文联艺术基金”支持。担任2016年G20国际峰会、2017年金砖国际峰会、2019年庆祝中华人民共和国成立70周年文艺晚会等国家重大创演任务的音乐主创成员。其多部作品在国际国内广泛公演，均获得很高评价。部分作品在人民音乐出版社、中国文联出版社等出版发行，并入选：“十三五”国家重点出版规划项目、中宣部重点出版物选题等。北京民族乐团常任指挥；甘肃省歌舞剧院首席客座指挥，天津歌舞剧院客席指挥，中国民族管弦乐学会指挥专业委员会理事，中国音乐学院附中少年民族乐团常任指挥；“不亦乐乎”中国民族室内乐团艺术总监。近几年指挥了《燕京八景》《与鸣寻音》《丝路回响》《北方情思》《红色征程》《疯狂动物城》《大音华章》《自古英雄出少年》《我的信天游》《笙鸣远杨》中华四季音乐会：《春之声》《夏之夜》《秋之韵》《冬之旅》、首演了关迺忠改编的民族管弦乐版《追梦京华》、京蒙联袂 两团三地共同演绎《北京夜·草原情》、第二季中国音乐竞演节目《国乐大典》—巅峰之夜、北京民族乐团成立四周年音乐会《北京颂歌》、首演了国家艺术基金资助项目二胡与民族管弦乐队《宋词意境》、《红楼梦》全版主题音乐会、北京文化艺术基金资助项目“2019北京金秋优秀剧目展演”入围剧目 大型原创民族管弦乐作品《新国门畅想》、将京味儿与潮流元素相结合的《国潮》2020新年音乐会 。担任跨界国乐剧《春江花月夜》及原创情景音乐会《五行》的排练指挥，同时录制了这两首作品。参与了民族室内乐作品音乐会《情缘》等项目。录制了《行歌江南》《西域梦》等多部新作品。积累了大量曲目和工作经验。北京民族乐团阮首席、中国音乐学院硕士研究生、中国民族管弦乐学会阮专业委员会副秘书长。师从于中国音乐学院国乐系魏蔚教授。曾在维也纳金色大厅、开罗歌剧院等地参与演出大型音乐会。2012年受音乐人三宝之邀参与电视剧《景德镇》及大型舞剧《孔雀》的音乐录制。2014年参与韩红单曲《贪念》的录制。2016年参与胡磊原创舞剧《七尺》的音乐录制。2018年，作为北京民族乐团“玖乐室内乐组合”的成员赴日本举办参与“风华国乐”民族音乐会，巡演达50场深受当地乐迷的喜爱；同年6月在北京音乐厅成功首演了中阮协奏曲《精卫》。2019年5月受录音师刘达之邀录制专辑《乐歌》民乐小曲集；同年7月于北京音乐厅成功举办“琴弦上的芭蕾”中阮协奏曲专场音乐会；同年12月受音乐人吕亮之邀参与电视剧《清平乐》的音乐录制。2020年11月于北京国图音乐厅，首演了北京民族乐团大型原创民族音乐会《漫·弹》——中阮协奏曲《人散后，一钩新月天如水》。2021年9月于中山音乐堂，首演了北京民族乐团大型原创民族音乐会《大运河》第五乐章——阮协奏曲《运河明珠》，并且在演奏形式上首次开创了一人完成阮族演奏（高音阮、小阮、中阮、大阮）的形式。2018年至2022年，受音乐人郭好为之邀与追光动漫合作，先后参与了动画电影《白蛇·缘起》、《哪吒·重生》、《新神榜·杨戬》的音乐录制。2023年受音乐人郭思达之邀参与电视剧《山河月明》的音乐录制。2012年至2015年参与三宝原创音乐剧《钢的琴》、《王二的长征》、《聂小倩与宁采臣》的全国上百场巡演。2016年至今任职于北京民族乐团，并在《丝路回响》、《追梦京华》、《生如夏花》、《国·潮》、《漫·弹》、《大运河》等大型音乐会中担任独奏、协奏。北京歌剧舞剧院独唱演员，中国音乐家协会会员，北京音乐家协会会员，现师从著名男高音歌唱家郁钧剑教授。2021年10月获第十三届中国音乐金钟奖声乐（民族）比赛金钟奖金奖，2022年11月被联合国世界非物质文化遗产保护基金会授予“国际和平艺术家”荣誉称号，“中国文化国际传播年度人物”荣誉称号，2023年1月获“2022中国文艺领军人物”荣誉称号，2019年10月获第十二届中国音乐金钟奖声乐（民族）比赛第六名，2021年4月获第十三届中国音乐金钟奖北京选拔赛（民族组）特别奖，2021年5月获第十三届中国音乐金钟奖陕西选拔赛（民族组）第一名，2014年6月获第四届全国高等艺术院校民族声乐大赛西安赛区艺术院校教师组一等奖等。曾在秧歌剧《米脂婆姨绥德汉》中饰演男一号“石娃”；2016年6月参加“中国艺术节”文艺晚会，9月参加在国家大剧院举办的国务院参事室中秋晚会，10月在人民大会堂参加纪念红军长征胜利80周年《永远的长征》文艺晚会；2017年9月参加第五届南昌国际军乐节，12月参加全国政协新年茶话会为党和国家领导人演出；2019年10月1日参加《向着伟大梦想》庆祝建国70周年阅兵式专场晚会；15日应邀参加第六届“中国诗河之夜”诗歌音乐晚会；2021年6月参加北京市“庆祝中国共产党成立100周年”专场演出，7月3日参加“纪念全民族抗战爆发84周年‘在党的旗帜下’主题交响合唱音乐会”，9月10日受邀参加民族交响诗《大运河》首演，2022年1月受邀参加“2022北京卫视虎年春节联欢晚会”，4月20日受邀参加国家大剧院第一届“国乐之春”中华四季音乐会，24日参加2022杭州国际音乐节等。多次参加CCTV-1套《经典咏流传》、CCTV-7套《军营大舞台》和CCTV-15《民歌中国》、山西卫视《歌从黄河来》等节目的录制，并多次在人民大会堂、国家大剧院、北京音乐厅、中山音乐堂、清华大学、北京大学、北京工人体育馆、民族文化宫大剧院、成都城市音乐厅、桂林体育馆等剧院及高校演出！ 北京民族乐团青年笙演奏家，是北京民族乐团2018年引入的优秀人才。毕业于中央音乐学院，先后师从于张晓东、袁永昌、杨守成教授。作为笙独奏演奏家，参演“华沙之秋”国际现代音乐节、北京现代音乐节等国内外知名音乐节。2019年，随中央音乐学院赴美国卡内基音乐厅进行独奏；2018年，作为优秀毕业生代表，在“庆祝改革开放40周年音乐会”中，与中央音乐学院交响乐团合作，于国家大剧院上演秦文琛笙协奏曲《云川》。 出版专辑《Pilgrim-郑杨笙现代作品音乐会》。曾获2013年文化部 “中国民族器乐民间乐种组合展演评奖”最高演奏奖等奖项。国家一级演员，京剧梅派传人，北京市直机关青联委员。北京京剧院青年团青衣演员；著名京剧表演艺术家梅葆玖先生入室弟子；中国戏曲学院第六届优秀青年京剧演员研究生班研究生；2019年举办“潇声咏梅”个人京剧专场演出；2017年出版发行个人专辑《梅派传人郑潇——玉堂春》。先后师承：王梅、张春秋、艾美君、张晶、蔡英莲、王志怡、梅葆玖、姜凤山、薛亚萍、阎桂祥、沈健瑾、马小曼、李玉芙等名家。2012年被北京京剧院确定为“青年领军”。曾赴美国、俄罗斯、奥地利、捷克、匈牙利等国家交流演出。擅演剧目：《凤还巢》《玉堂春》《大·探·二》《贵妃醉酒》《秦香莲》《四郎探母》《生死恨》《太真外传》《红鬃烈马》《沙家浜》等。新编剧目：《郭琇洗堂》、《屈原》、《南海子》、《大宅门》；小剧场京剧《马前泼水》《昭王渡》；清宫升平署连台本戏《昭代箫韶》。郑潇嗓音宽亮，声音表现力强，近年来尝试京歌融合演唱，受到广大观众喜爱，曾为《赤壁》《天下归心》《风雨同仁堂》《正定记忆》《瑞蚨祥》等二十余部新创京剧、舞台剧演唱主题曲及插曲。跨界代表作：《列传》、《赤伶》、《琵琶行》《墙头马上》、《水调歌头》等。荣获奖项：文化部全国优秀青年演员折子戏展演金奖；CCTV全国青年京剧演员电视大赛银奖；中国戏剧家协会全国戏曲红梅大赛金红梅奖；京津冀青年京剧人才展演“最佳青年演员呈现奖”。（演出曲目以演出现场为准）点击下方海报直达演出介绍